I actually fell asleep with him in my bed. We slept until 8 PM.
Italian Wedding Soup, Homemade Bread
Sorry, it has been awhile since my last post. Our little man is just fine!
Things I should be doing to prepare for David leaving :
TMD gravity manipulation Gravity Gun
“In the same way, faithfulness to the tradition and the dogmatic teaching of the church means not only that the right formulations of terms are not altered, but also that our lives are altered and renewed by the truth and regenerative power latent in these terms. Them man acquires senses and is able to see; he becomes conscious of the deeper meaning and value of the Orthodox faith as a force in life. A characteristic expression of this is the inclusion, among the credal and dogmatic monuments of the Orthodox Catholic Church, of the liturgies of St. John Chrysostom and St. Basil the Great, complete with their typikon or liturgical rubrics and the actual manner of their celebration. For it is not only prayers with the dogmatic content but the whole liturgical action and life of the Church that constitutes a unique theological witness and grace.
You will need the National Insurance Number if you’re going to work in the UK. To apply for it, you’ll need to be in the UK and go to a Job Centre Plus. There will be people there to help you with information on what steps you must take but, just to make an idea, let me ‘unveil’ some of this to you.
Tim and I originally planned to take the train back to Paris the next morning, but being the awesome people they are, our family drove us into the city and dropped us off at our hotel. (After stopping at a patisserie on our way, of course.)
School breaks are great to catch up on movies with the kids.
doing crafty stuff, which is always a tad sad,
You never know what lies ahead down the road.
Or Else.
Sorry that it's been awhile since I have posted. For the last 3 weeks Bo has been sick. Long story short he started with an eye infection and ended up not eating or drinking for over a week. He ended up at the emergency vet and spent the night and then we transferred him to our regular vet. where he stayed 3 more nights. After many test, they thought he must have swallowed a foreign object. He was headed to surgery, but they said lets do a Chemistry blood test, which we are pretty sure we wouldn't find anything because he is so young(2 1/2 years old). But unfortunately, he came up with a problem related to his kidneys. They did fluid therapy and we brought him home and the latest news is he has improved!
Reggie Sibiya, chief executive of the Fuel Retailers Association, said Friday his group was ‘worried by growing fuel shortages affecting its members across South Africa. There are increasing reports from our members of non-delivery of fuel, the problems on the ground are becoming serious, especially in the inland areas," Sibiya said.
List of Tables 4
I have tried, with limited success, to eliminate seafood from my diet, which already does not include meat or poultry. I'm pretty much done with fish, well except for that albacore salad Warren's mom served up a couple months ago. And last autumn's food poisoning put me off mussels for quite awhile.
Making sushi may seem like an intimidating undertaking, but trust me, it’s pretty simple, and very gratifying. The first roll or two may fall apart on you, but try again and you’ll eventually get the hang of it. Luckily, all your mistakes will still be delicious!
The fam and I took alittle field to the HD on Saturday…I was on the lookout for a new closet bar and brackets. I had an idea.
The Club – Sarah Brunsdon
Head on over and browse around the new site, and feel free to comment with feedback on what you'd like to see more or less of. You can expect to read lots of posts about local hikes and travel destinations in Oregon, delicious and easy recipes, local and national resources for sustainably grown meat and veggies, tutorials and DIY tips, helpful links and more! Pocket Pause will be a week day blog, with 3-5 posts a week. Looking for more tips on DIY beauty products or herbal medicine? Check out Bathtime, our sister blog for weekly posts about natural bathing, healing and fun using herbs and essential oils.
If you, like me, have ever slagged off anyone in authority using the medium of words, the current predicament of sweary blogger and avid Tweetist @Sir_Olly_C should have you rather worried.
At della Rovere’s, the priest finds a method of deposing a pope: proving he’s publicly keeping a concubine. Scandalizing the church is, apparently, heresy. But they need firm evidence of this lechery.
Here’s one thing I really like about this post: the Viennese are relatively wealthy and believe in recycling. In short: they give away great stuff. Love those thrift stores! I dropped a carload of junk off at Caritas today, from a pre-move purge, and was reminded of that once again. I left with eight Euros worth of happy. Which was just what I needed today.
It is incredible to realize you have lived before and will live again. There is always wonder that such a thing is possible. Knowledge of past lives has given me much greater respect for life and for my own actions. You do not need to remember your past lives to progress, but you do need to make the most of your time here on earth.
This is the place you give
1) Give up. That’s not really an option though because I’m not doing that.
Some believe Jesus was actually writing the Laws he knew them to be guilty of breaking and then writing out the names of the accusers. The scribes and Pharisees certainly would have been familiar with Jeremiah 17:13 as well as the letter of the Law as spelled out in Leviticus and Deuteronomy. That would have been more than enough reason for them to just turn and walk away. There would have been no argument.
The children recognized the poem "Jabberwocky" (which Alice reads in the looking glass house) both from reading it in a collection of poetry and from a parody of it in Science Verse by John Scieszka and Lane Smith. Lewis Carroll's poem involved made up words which seem almost sensible. Reading it slowly you can tell which part of speech each word is and that lets you string together the general gist of the poem even while you lack the details. We used to play a game a bit like this where we would take turns pretending to be an extraterrestial and use a few made up words and the other person would have to figure out from context what they were, but in those cases we offered more clues that "Jabberwocky" does. I'd like sometime to sit down and write out a couple of variations of "Jabberwocky," replacing some of the made up words with real words but trying to make each variation as different as possible from each other. How would the meaning change if "vorpal" (as in vorpal sword) meant "toy" in contrast to if it meant "deadly"? Could "slithy toves" that "gyre and gimble in the wabe" be bacteria eating and multiplying in the soil? Could it be fairy creatures dancing? Could it be peasants trudging and hauling in the fields? How flexible could those placeholders be? I might also take a different poem and work the other direction, replacing some of its words with made-up words to see how that feels. I also want to revisit the parody again with the children and talk about how knowing the context of it changes the meaning of it. (The parody is about food additives. Is modern food full of additivies something like a looking-glass version of real food?)
My earlier blog on Andalusia will tell you how we covered both Sevilla and Cordoba during the Semana Santa. Perfect place to be in, except that the weather hardly cooperated. Just the same, we were in luck when we reached Cordoba. Miercoles Santo had 8 processions running. All ending at the Mesquita. We didn’t watch all 8, but our attention was drawn to the young Nazarenos — trainees? Protégés? — in the crowd.
Thornton’s material is consistently strong, with a decent range and a hefty amount of audience ribbing – pity the fools who sit in the front row. As with many comedy shows, Thornton’s sex-based material is the strongest. It’s even stronger when the materials includes one particularly hilarious story about his mum, a sexual health nurse, dealing with a recalcitrant teenage student who was trying to explain a slang word for ‘semen’ by gesturing to his crotch.
I was a bit dazed, to be honest, and probably looked like I was on drugs (not guilty!), but no matter. I grabbed a burger and a cookie (which was very good) and wolfed them down.
The diet thang is supposed to go hand in hand with the not drinking thing. The comments above about win and rum suggest that this isn’t going well. I’ve easily ditched the wine with a meal habit and am eating out without drinking and not drinking as much at home. I can’t quite ditch the ‘wine with my mum habit’ or the ‘drink on a Friday night treat’ habit.
is??...even the difficult parts??
After the gym Ryann and I headed to Jenn and JT's house for a little playdate. JT was too cute, and had to pull his chair right up next to Ryann while they were coloring. Do you see that face pinching in the picture of Ryann and I? Yeah, love hurts. She was in a crazy mood that afternoon and was running laps around the family room. And just a clean happy little girl.
Effectiveness is dependent on more than commitment and/or enthusiasm. No matter how committed or enthused I was I’m never going to climb to the top of Mount Everest. But reading a poem and ascending the world’s highest mountain have more in common than you might imagine. They both require focus and how long we can focus on something is something that you can put a time limit on. We’re talking here about our attention span,
Davis documents the moments in her life that are relevant to discussing her weight, how she feels about herself, etc. Again, I think it is the capturing of the little moments again here that I am connecting to, but the message behind her work held my interest even more so.
Everybody monitors your mail.
From my eyes I express this sorrow.
“How am I to be, how are we to be, in relation to the suffering of others?”
EPA Administrator Armendariz took on Texas’ Range Resources with an emergency order issued by EPA Region 6 which it justified by making unfounded claims that because of fracking “houses could explode.” Interviews with the EPA warned repeatedly of the “danger of fires and explosions.” That case was another legal embarrassment for the EPA.
Watch carefully, Okay?
When I think about it, I realize that there have been many, many moments that I’ve summoned 20 seconds of insane courage to carry me from a starting moment through confident completion, from a challenge into success, and from the person I was 20 seconds ago, to the person I am standing in this very moment.
“Simply step outside” and never forget “It’s for the children”
Your colour this month - Lemon
It’s pretty hard to say something amusing in another language since each country or region has a very different sense of humor. In Catalunya for instance, their comedy was very much like Monty Python stuff — fairly educated but with a dash of the silly and a healthy dose of sex jokes. My in with them came after I realized that they absolutely love scatological jokes, which is something I can work with.
I am glad that you liked it a lot.
Which do you prefer?
One hugely disheartening setback at this point though, was that when the nurse broke my water, she checked my progress and I'd not progressed at ALL from when I'd come to the hospital (a 3). I was devastated. Surely after a whole morning of pacing, Pitocin, and increasingly strong contractions, I'd made SOME kind of progress? It really shook my confidence and made me feel incredibly disappointed and doubtful that I'd be able to manage any kind of pain once I dilated further. If it hurt this much at a 3, what the heck would a 6 feel like?
Here the Wallpaper
@JQAdams_MHS This account run by the Massachusetts Historical Society. They take actual one-line diary entries from John Quincy Adams and tweet them every morning. Incredibly fascinating that we get to read the actual words of our sixth President.
komt er dan nooit geen einde aan dien tocht
Many thanks to every single one of you who has read my blog this year and a seasonal hug and kiss to everyone who's left a comment. I can't tell you how much I appreciate it.
Before your children get to three years old, you may want to practice, you know, so you don’t accidentally eat them at some point during that rewarding and calming year. Here are my suggestions, ways to practice, if you will, for the three year old you will someday have.
But should we, or an angel from Heaven, preach any other gospel unto you than that which we have preached to you, let him be accursed. (Gal. 1:8)
all these birds soaring to the warmth
Ten years ago I wrote an essay about my father for graduate school. But it wasn’t for school actually. Parents, particularly departed parents, spur words even when the words ride no bigger idea than need. My father was a quiet man. Maybe I meant to give him a voice, but when I stumbled onto the essay, I didn’t hear him. It was my voice instead. I wasn’t begging for his resuscitation but standing over his form trying to account for his silence. I didn’t remember the scenes I depicted and, as I read on, I began to wonder if writing them killed those scenes forever.
Baby bear
I hope you have really good lives, friends,
come back Nikki, come back
Nothing fits the soul-searching of Good Friday as well as meditations/devotionals. What was the most powerful insight you received from this Good Friday? How did it bring you closer to God? Did you see the cross in a fresh way? What gave it special meaning this year? What part of the crucifixion story grabbed you? Share your spiritual lessons with your readers.
The top is Harve Bernard:
Today’s nugget-o-fiction is set in a post-apocalypse world, if you hadn’t guessed by the teaser. I consider this to be in a rough rough draft state, but if anyone wants to read it they can email me.
In this recipe, I used a jar of organic spaghetti sauce. I have read about canned tomatoes leaching BPA out of the can lining, and I haven't been able to find tomatoes in jars. So, I have resorted to using jars of spaghetti sauce instead. Do you know where to find tomatoes in jars?
I don't know what kind of people were here, they all well dressed, but they didn't know that the Sushi we were having was BullShit.
An enchantment of my heart’s indignation
You cannot add it.
The Russians replaced Comrade Bearcub with … Comrade Bear. And, in one of his final acts as President, Dimitry Medvedev replaced the commander of the Russian Navy, Admiral Vladimir Vysotsky, with a (slightly) younger man:
But, well-wrought as they may be, modern novels are not exempt from this type of inferiority. They achieve it despite the artistry Pritchett has correctly attributed to them. But their own shortfalls are not the result of sloppiness or lethargy or any of the other vices Pritchett attributes to Tolstoy & Co. Simply put, few if any of them are Tolstoys or Balzacs. This process of passing off artistry for art and literary tidiness for genius has been accelerated by the intrusion of the university into the writing process. Now we have not only well-wrought prose, no matter how boring the content; we have it mass-produced and regularized not just according to form but by content as well.
“We are an independent trade publisher based in the heart of Canary Wharf along side other world famous media and publishing groups. We publish quality literature which will form the new platform from which twenty first century writers will be discovered. We are therefore searching for authors with excellent writing skills which accord with our high standards. Our lists contain a wide range of subjects both fiction and non fiction, and we produce a variety of interesting and readable books for all ages and tastes.”
My father didn't have an external need for accurate time, no job or medical reason that things had to be done precisely. My dad was a mild OCD type, a recorder, and I didn't realize how much of one until after he died in 2010. I put a new battery in the kitchen clock for my mother a few weeks ago, and found, taped to the back, a list of all the times he'd re-set the clock, and how much it was off by...according to CHU, no doubt.
“Reforms related to WTO accession require a change of attitude, not only a change of law,” Khemmani Pholsena, vice-minister of industry and commerce for Lao PDR, told IPS. “Lao PDR has reviewed and enacted some 25 trade-related laws and 50 other legislations since 2000. And I believe that these reforms will strengthen the rule of law, thereby cutting down on undue privileges and possibilities of corruption.”
Here, Cornerstone reveals itself my first winey love, back from the dead, all aniseed, pepper and red berry compote. It swaggers in and sits down heavily next to the Venison and Binham Blue Cheese Suet Pudding, invading its personal space. No slouch itself in the flavour department, the pudding looks timid, nervous. "You and me. We're friends, right?" growls the wine. The food meekly agrees. It's a match, but only because the food knows it would get knocked about the room and bounced off the walls it if disagreed.
In order for Hubby to make his plane tomorrow, I have to get up at 3:30AM. He is going to OWE me big time after this one. As if, getting up at 4:30AM is not ungodly enough. Tomorrow is going to be my grumpiest day EVER….that is until I get my Guiness. Stay away, I warn you….just stay away.
.nytro
Three: You will be able to correct any mistakes you might make.
But it's ok, because motherhood is a higher calling. I know that.
No, the athletes aren't on the field running patterns and plays. But they do get in incredible shape! Running backs, wide receivers, and defensive backs that sprint, hurdle, long or triple jump sharpen their speed and quickness - invaluable in the sport of football. Even linemen that throw the shot, discus or hammer are able to work on their explosion and footwork - ask Olympic shot put silver medalist Michael Carter, a three time pro bowl nose tackle for the 49ers!
AJ introduces the new Number One Contender for the World Heavyweight Title, Bobby Roode.
there that bring happiness to others and don't cost a dime. If you haven't heard
Becoming a manager. I feel all grown-up.
8 By oppression and judgment he was taken away;
days—the weeks that lag.
Cool, break up any clusters of nuts (this is where I have a hard time controlling sampling activity). The nuts keep in an airtight container in the refrigerator for about 2 weeks.
Ownership : Google, Manufacturer
5. The Gossip - Vertical Rhythm
She is taking one class at a local community center. It is 25 minutes of tap and 20 minutes of ballet. She says she likes ballet the best. That's my girl!
I’m ashamed to say we sneaked out before Spiers and Boden were done. No disrespect; they are as good as it gets. But the SS had an early start, and we’d had our money’s worth with Hannah, and it’s just...I don’t know...Folk should be hot and sweaty. Three pints of cider and sunshine in a field or a tatty back room, a dog under the table and a crush at the bar. It’s a foot-stomping participation sport, not a performance art. Where under forties are allowed as well.
“Avengers Assemble!”
00:30 – 02:00 Re-Volt
Puss N' Boots / These Boots (Are Made for Walking)
Alyssa
I researched POD companies. But the costs were also prohibitive in going this method. Again, I would have to put all of the money up front, purchase the books and go from there. The only difference is I would have a book and not a photocopied manuscript.
The group The Long Lost is comprised of the man with the magic muttonchops, Daedelus, and his wife Laura Darlington. The group also features some of their friends backing on violin, flute, and other various instruments ranging from guitar to xylophone.
"What's the point?" I said. "Independents will determine the winner, so you and I are in the position of trying to pick whom we think the independents will vote for over Obama."
Now there's a bright idea.
Dams being built.
That said, Low's exceptional power generally lies not in volume but in the absence of it, not in heady release but in tense restraint. Even the quietest strum is loaded with literal and metaphorical resonance, the quietest word a subtle twist of the knife. Slow and deliberate, no one does ominous beauty quite like them.
for a brief moment my hair has volume; Honey Badger doesn't care
As I go home, I know things are different. I know that I had a heart change in the last 6 months. Jesus is not a stranger to me. He is not some random guy in the sky, ignoring me. He is my friend, my father, my brother, my husband, my everything. When I heard people describe him like that 6 months ago, I never thought I could have it. But I WANTED it. I was DESPERATE for it. I NEEDED it. He seemed so distant, but the desire for him was more than anything I had ever had. That is how I know he is there, by this supernatural desire to just KNOW him. I questioned at times why I couldn't feel him. Why I couldn't see him. Why I couldn't hear him. And in these last 3 weeks, it all clicked. As long as I had this desire for him, I was never going to give up. This is a desire that needs to be fulfilled and can not be pushed aside. As long as it was there, I was going to keep searching. If I never got a feeling, I was going to search. If I never heard his voice, I was going to search. As soon as that clicked, it all happened. I fell in love. I am in love with a beautiful man named Jesus. I giggle when I think about him and his abundant love and grace, how I don't deserve but he gives it away anyways. I barely know Him, but I love him. Never letting him go. I have the rest of my life to keep falling in love, and I am pumped for it.
SECURITY_DESCRIPTOR sd;
Student at Umeå University in northern Sweden. Spatial planning, cultural and economic geography, GIS and much more! Soon done and will have an bachelor degree in cultural geography 2013. Follow me on Twitter @stenberg82
Isn't this gorgeous?! I love the shadows of Kanzi and bamboo leaves falling on the model's skin (very thematically significant!) and the darkness around her face. That lovely red circle, which I assume represents the moon as well as being a nod to the Japanese flag, is also a beautiful touch. I just wish that I could get a translation of all the words (both Polish and Japanese) on this cover! So intriguing. Here's a link to the page where I found it, which I pressed the translate function on - the translated synopsis is good for a laugh in my opinion. I really hope that's not what the Polish people are reading!
Even though there is no manual for raising children, I'm so happy for wise parents, and an even wiser loving Heavenly Father who put in place some good directions on how we should behave. It made the situation turn into something that Alli would be talking to therapists for years about, into something that can be chalked up into the 'lessons learned' category of life'. For that, I am so thankful.
“The Alighieri Line.” Her voice was sharp, but it cracked as though it had not been used for a long time. She had a harsh accent that might have been Italian.
Hope everyone is doing well, and are ready
And when it all becomes like an assembly line it
In a medium bowl, mix flour, baking powder, spices and salt together.
You start off raring to go.
The empire’s populations cheered this strategy out of fear of being attacked by these rogue nations who never attacked or even threatened to attack them. In the fog of fear, killing and stealing became acceptable. In fact, detention without charges and even torture became acceptable in the former capital of freedom. America has determined that the means justifies the end — which is more power.
Step 2: I sanded all the 1s and 6s for 16, ya know. Glued that onto the brown base.
C: Jesus gave you curly hair?
July 4, 2011
I did a short stint in the social security office, posting envelopes deliberately late to miss the post.
Aah those Sindh mountains we saw driving through the desert - where the University of Sindh appears like an oasis, and the Indus River, a diminishing gift. Dreams should always land up in desert mountains, and drained to the sea. So majestic and serene; their heat could suffocate. We see the historic city of Bhubak. We wet our feet in Sindhu. We stop at the tomb of Shabaz Qalander at Sehwan. I like that Sufis blended religions to appeal to their followers' tastes, but this is just a racket now. Hundreds lie in the stench of the shrine waiting for biryanis to be handed out. After seeing a community gaunt from water starvation, this display of generosity (and gluttony) is vile. It does not feel spiritual. We quickly give fifty rupee notes to faqirs who pray for us and handle us as like veteran hustlers. There is no god to be found here. No need to pray so hard. There are people living without water and on cracked earth, while the duffers will have their golf courses. We all are a little bit mad. Years ago, as children, we visited Haleji Lake. Those were the good days for that lake too, and I remember meeting a family. We gave them saunf and talked to them for hours; they seemed very poor. The father said his daughter was pulled by a crocodile while she washed clothes by the edge. His face still haunts me. That croc is an endangered species too.
Unhinged by Moorland Stream
Nelson has an MBA in International Marketing and Finance from Kellstadt Graduate School of Business at DePaul University and a Bachelor of Science degree in Human and Organizational Development from Vanderbilt University. She was born and raised in Brooklyn, N.Y. and is engaged to be married later this year.
ravikirank asked, in my last interview i told the interviewer that i acheived only 60% of the target because of some circumastances this year. he applied the same to his organization says they can’t take the reasons what i mentioned in the interview for non acheivement in thier organization if i supposed to work the same circumstances in the new organization. even though i make it to the final interview by this i think they didn’t consider my candidature. would like to should only lie in the interviews to get recruited and how this can be overcome.
Yes folks, we’re back in the land of the Oxy Morons, that alien species convinced that you can have something called austere growth. It’s a similar concept to zero-alcohol meths, and equally useful. It’s also called bollocks.
* Crafts adrenals, stims, medkits/med stations and implants.
01 MACHINES (Giorgio Moroder) 5'27
Name-calling against our President is a big one.
So anyway I got stuck with Coke bottle lenses and Pod's eyes are even worse than mine, so it stands to reason that our kids will end up with glasses too. I'm sure there are all kinds of cute frames out there, but I was kind of planning on buying new glasses for myself this spring. I'll have to table that plan, or maybe I can find a "buy one pair, get two free" coupon somewhere. Plus I think I need to incorporate bifocals in my new pair. Really, my eyesight is failing. Like that! (Picture me snapping my fingers right now).
With regard to community, there are several directions in which you can go, and all are effective with your audience. As noted above, it’s perfectly acceptable to discuss atheists as outside of communities. (Readers will naturally judge that only religion can offer a certain kind of community, and that neither atheism nor any other basis for camaraderie – interests, fun, social struggles - is equivalent. Atheists therefore have to construct a substitute for this religious benefit or fail.) Don’t bother looking for atheist-skeptical or other nonreligious communities - they are few and far between.
3. Do you use Twitter? If not, what the heck not? :)
The Saints will be playing in the Super bowl next Sunday! A week later is Valentine’s Day, and the Tuesday after that is Mardi Gras. Crawfish season is really kicking off after the recent unexpected frigid weather. Dorsey caught enough in our pond for our first big boil of the year last night.
origin deals with life the way they do! They do not have the ability
I think part of the reason I just don't wear stuff like this anymore is because I live in a very very VERY conservative area now. Maybe one day when I don't live here anymore I will wear things like this coat once again but for now, it hangs in my closet and I'll never ever get rid of it.
441222 Boat dealers
It makes me dread the holidays, plan for his reaction to changes in my life, second guess everything I say for fear of it finding its way back to me, sick and twisted with hate.
As with all human analogies, this one breaks down pretty quickly, so I don’t know if I would even call it an analogy, maybe just a few parallels. It’s just that the generosity of the prosecutor was an act that reminded me how much more God has done that for us.
Currently, the media is showing a horribly skewed picture of the real world. Fiction writers, with our limitless power to reinvent the world, to hold a mirror up to it or subvert it, are showing a horribly skewed picture of the world. If you are not white, if you are not straight, if you are not physically perfect (and to some extent, if you are one of the slightly more than 50% of the population who is female) you know how it feels to wonder why no one wants to write about people LIKE YOU for a freaking change.
Here is the improved, ‘blogified’ version. (This was written years ago, explaining the absence of the DVD.)
Corbett did not have an answer when asked if he had a solution, but said he supports a 401(k)-type plan that workers could invest in.
Lemon & Rosemary Roast Chicken
Brodsky proclaimed “a great personal admiration” for Bloomberg but said he remained at odds regarding the “Soviet-style bureaucracies… those are the state authorities,” such as ESDC and MTA, inaccessible, controlled largely by executives. “The mayor is the major obstacle to reforming public authorities, because he killed the bill in the last week of the session.”
Closest Focusing Distance: ~ 4 feet
Most of the time I am so content with being in our home as it is- ok to wait on the zillions of projects that are hopefully in our future. Today for some reason I can't enter our backyard without seeing everything I want to do to it. So, in order to process my frustration at being utterly unable to begin ANY my projects now, I'm going to share my plans... in the form of photos altered in Word by an absolute amateur. Namely, me.
Gunwalking
Each of us see in their loved ones who they want to see and never see the truth. We use to create a false image of a personality we want to see in the person we love. And when the mask disappears, the truth comes out which makes us disappointed. We miss a lot of thing that we consider unimportant, but they are essential. The ugly truth is that love in two-faced, sometimes it is sweet and delicate, but sometimes is like a wrongdoer.
“Car for JFK,” the driver announced, grabbing both of the bags.
Vomiting & abdominal pain is not fun at all.
So, I feel now that I must master the art of growing tomatoes from seed in order to feel in my deep down gardeny parts like a real and proper gardener. Which means that the part of the process in which I am a complete failure - hardening off young seedlings - must be cracked.
Great! So, we don’t want a president who is fat, old, has a bad leg, is not famous, or, most importantly has bad hair. We don’t mind a woman president, but mind you, she shouldn’t wear saree and boring blouses.
But even today with the bonds that we’ve made
Essentially each college or university can be thought of as a large town or small city. And each one has developed a sustainable, low-carbon model. There is every reason to believe that these models can be applied and tailored to our towns and cities across the nation, and they will create long-term white- and blue-collar jobs.
FOUL
Magically too, Juan Or did not appear resentful of the surrounding despite him not in his best of mood. Anyway, Joanne Kam Poh Poh was doing her talk performance and Mommy had Juan Or on Mommy's lap and we snapped a self-portrait as well.
Thank you for the freedom You have made possible for us through the work of Your one and only Son, Jesus Christ.
I love a bit of trash. But I understand that I have to consume it in context and moderation. Some people see glossy magazines as bread and butter (or maybe a pie), other people (ok people like me)understand them as the marshmallows of the literary food pyramid; squooshy, airy, sweet and definitely a sometimes food.
This is Part 10 in a 32 part instalment thanks to an email I found when cleaning up my work emails.
Or long-hair'd page in crimson clad
Really not the question I needed today. I blush more take a gulp of coffee and then choke. And carry on choking and wheezing until tears start streaming - not the impression I wanted to create. Ted whacks me on the back a few times and I eventually stop spluttering.
Product photographs by Jessica and Angie.
Thanks for your time in reading this. I know I don't usually get "heavy" on the ol' blog, but I thought this was important to share.
We thank you for our senses
3. Answer the questions the tagger set for you in their post, and then create 11 new questions to ask the people you've tagged.
She says, "Mama" occasionally when she is fussing. Yes, I know it's not intentional, but it's music to my ears!
So… while it is “all part of the journey,” – it is really all about HOW we journey. HOW are you doing?
THE PRESIDENT: Of course not. But I’m Teddy Roosevelt; I’m Kansas, which is a state in the MIDDLE and I promise to fight for the MIDDLE class in my second term, to fight against Republicans who hate the middle class, and to use my BIG STICK to force Congress to pass my jobs bill.
The MNfashion Holiday Boutique is made possible by a grant received from the Pohlad Family Foundation.
Comin thro' the grain;
The story encompasses more than one genre. It's part crime drama, involving drugs and the Russian mob; part revenge thriller; part supernatural, featuring a shrunken head; and part gory horror. All these elements come together to create an exciting and unique plot. And at 126 action-packed pages, you can easily finish it in one sitting.
As we try to come to terms with the loss of twenty-two of our own, we celebrate how they lived, and what they did. We celebrate their lives, the way we want our survivors to celebrate our own lives when we pass – to celebrate what have done, and not focus on what we have left undone. All of us will leave this world with work undone; it is reassuring to know that our families and loved ones at home, and our teammates and the next generation of warriors at work, will pick up where we leave off, and carry on.
For a brief moment, David considered the idea that this was some elaborate terrorist scheme and this tiny pebble held a bomb so powerful it could blow up Manhattan. But then he decided he was being paranoid and needed to perhaps cut down on reading certain types of screenplays.
Albums
Now, there were some "issues' if you could call them that at all. I think the biggest complaint I heard from most of the people around me was that there was little suspense, you pretty much kind of knew what was coming and how someone who going to be murdered. Example: Two girls on phone with other girl who lives next door when killer calls, says he's in the closet, two girls open closet and hes not there. Killer then says "I never said I was in yours" pops out of the next door neighbors closet and kills her. If you didn't see that coming from a mile away then you're probably blind, or getting popcorn and missing the action. I'm not that creative, but I still think after fifteen years, it's pretty difficult to come up with a new way for someone to to pop out and stab someone with a hunting knife, so there is little complaint from me on that one. The action was still really good and there still were a few parts that made me jump (and some thirty year old guy scream like a girl behind me).
I’m very much a texture diner and I actually forgot about taking a comparison picture after I opened the Chobani and tasted it. (You can see how the cup’s half empty in the last picture!) Right down to the last bite, Chobani’s yogurt was smooth, silky and so light that it dissolved over my palate that kept me scooping up more.
Vincent Chong
a. Michigan (I did not know that it is called The Mitten! How cute! I guess that lack of geographic awareness is part of what happens when you grow up in California, in addition to not knowing what snow is).
When Sleater Kinney went on permanent hiatus following their final release, The Woods, Brownstein turned to a number of activities, among them blogging for NPR. In a famous 2009 post entitled, “Rock Music Goes the Way of the Beard,” Brownstein lamented the “the rise in popularity of mostly bearded men making very sensitive music: Fleet Foxes, Andrew Bird, Bon Iver, Devendra Banhart, Beirut, Girls, Grizzly Bear, The Dodos, Iron & Wine, and so forth and so on.” The former Sleater Kinney guitarist noted it worked for both genders, throwing Feist and others into the mix as well. Brownstein advocated for more power, more agency. “What we need is more contemporary rock music that addresses or mirrors the chaos, the gray areas and the uneasiness. Just go listen to The Stooges or Bikini Kill for a second to remember what that sounds like,” she implored. “I enjoy sweet songs as much as the next person, but I’m tired of passive music that allows us to merely sit back. I want music that makes me sit up. Personally, I think it’s time to shave the beard and risk getting a cut or two. “
I tell myself that my in-laws are different from other people because they are from another time and place. Like characters from Steinbeck's The Grapes of Wrath, they grew up during the Depression and the Dust Bowl: he on a hardscrabble ranch in Montana, she on a desolate farm in South Dakota.
4. How does it end for Batman?
I love maters.
Monday 5/14 - Two different Randall beers! Honeycomb lavender Goode Farmhouse and Dry Hopped IPA at McCoy's. Unfamiliar with a beer Randall? A Randall is basically a filter that can hold different flavor enhancers for a beer. We'll run the beer through it, giving it a fresh extra little taste. So on the Farmhouse, the Randall will be holding some honeycomb and lavender, we'll push the beer through it, and you'll be served a freshly-flavored beer! Here's a clip from Dogfish Head's famous Randall the Enamel Animal, being used to add an extra hop kick to a beer -
I don’t think they are interested to know that they went against the will of thousands of others who were present in unity and solidarity for a worthy cause. Or that their unruly behaviour caused so much anxiety and misery, even endangering lives, to so many people who wanted to assemble peacefully.
Almost totally abandoning my theory of mothering, I cosseted that plant - but only when no-one was looking. Cosseting doesn't count if you are the only one who knows about it and it is done secretly behind closed doors when everyone is asleep or out. It had the best windowsill, the correct amount of watering, the perfect compost, it was spoken to lovingly in the tenderest of whispers .... in spite of all this, last week DH compelled me to admit that it wasn't just dormant, but that it had literally curled up and died:
A little trashier than Drag Me To Hell, it was still an entertaining (if brainless) watch.
Thus I fear that Perfume444, in his euphoria-induced daze, has forgotten what he is here for. At some point it seems his videos stopped being about declaring about his love for Perfume, and became about maintaining his character as Perfume444. That kind of shit won’t fly. A truly great and passionate video must be about … “being the world’s greatest Perfume fan,” not “being the Perfume444 guy.” Because once you start thinking more of yourself, than thinking of the things that inspired you in the first place, then you have lost your soul.
Two weeks ago our beloved god daughter was here and we floated on inner tubes down the Comal River with friends, took Luke to the beach almost every day,
Dreaming of my father is a pleasant surprise.
with his photo and a few words BOLDLY displayed on the GIANT MONITOR
One Shoulder Wedding Dresses:
Belle goes in on Wednesday for an exam and then we will know when she will be bred and then we will have PUPPIES!!! I can't wait for puppies....I think!
I also read about the history of England in that time period, the way of life, culture, customs, clothing, music, food:
Third-party support; the Achilles’ Heel of Nintendo. Every Nintendo console has more than a handful of notable first-party titles. The problem, for the past decade, has been moving beyond the expertise of the native company. In the long run, the Wii U won’t survive without big-name companies backing the technology. According to Nintendo, this is an obstacle that they are overcoming.
Must everything be perfect?
My wife has an advanced degree in social work, spent several years working in a community pharmacy, and is married to a pharmacist. She is qualified to navigate mail order system. Several years ago she was diagnosed with acid reflux (GERD) and prescribed a high priced proton pump inhibitor, Dexilant, by her physician. Proton-pump inhibitors (PPIs) are a group of drugs whose main action is a pronounced and long-lasting reduction of gastric acid production. Using my expert drug knowledge to lower drug costs, I suggested her physician prescribe a lower cost alternative from the same class that would produce a similar outcome. Her physician agreed but her insurance would only pay for Dexilant and she had to get it through the pharmacy benefit manager’s (PBM) mail order pharmacy. As ridiculous as this was, we accepted it and moved on with our lives.
Excel consists of spreadsheets containing rows, columns and subsequently cells. A cell can contain hard coded data or a formula. In order to enter a formula into a cell simply start by typing “=”.
I got all the seeds that were in her mouth out, and quickly poured her some milk (base vs. acid-- I'm not completely useless in science!) Poor baby! After some rocking, more milk, petting, soothing, and sweet-talking-- she did calm down-- but was still all blotchy.
- Have one soccer/football practice and be the best player ever
I had a mini-crisis with one of my manuscripts which was due into production this last week. I won't go into details, but I will say it was 0% the fault of the author, who has done a fantastic job helping me make up for lost time. I also want to say I hope God blames me and not my author for the fact that I made my author work over Passover weekend (I swear, if I had put two and two together when he mentioned a "holiday weekend" I wouldn't have set such a hard deadline!! Sincere apologies to both God and my author about this.).
Sonographer (SG): Just follow me please.
When we are completely in the moment, when our chattering minds are stilled, when our sense of self falls away and there is only the now, we become enlightened. In this state, many great things can happen – the perfect haiku is written, the archer and the target become one and the bullseye is hit without thought, the music simply flows, the painting emerges.
They also combine to spend 17 billion on pet food.
John and Sarah Smythe’s younger brother and sister – 10 and 13 year old Phillip and Leah – move from the Plymouth Colony to the new Massachusetts Bay Colony. In the process, they encounter a Narragansett Indian White Wolf, Roger Williams, and angry, bigoted townsfolk. The children deal with colonial life, the measles, leeching, Native American herbal medicine, apothocary tinctures, and “modern” medicine. Phillip’s best friend leaves for Salem, following Roger Williams, and Phillip works hard – really, really hard. I appreciated the Christian values, as well as the daily life portrayed. The feel of living in the Massachusetts Bay Colony was quite different from the the Plymouth Colony from the previous two books. I really appreciate the series, and I think it’s a valuable contribution to our unit so far.
Released: 20th July 2011
It is welcome that domestic waste disposal issues have become 'mainstream', and this is progress from the Daily Mail's obsession with weekly bin collections (a battle it now knows it has lost).
Some thoughts:
I don't go in for all those stupid writing rules (see Writing 101 Production No 8 for more about this), but when I have a book to finish, I know I must put all else aside and concentrate on only that. So, what worked for me (and what may work for you) is the following:
I am so sorry, I meant to have this post up yesterday, but we drove back from Pennsylvania and when I got home I simply crashed. No blogging for me.
14) Pretty Cool Guy
On April 29, 2011, Tasca was on patrol when she got a call for medical assistance. Former Bogota Council Member Tara Sharp, concerned about the erratic behavior of her 22-year-old son Kyle, called the police to take him to the hospital for a psychological evaluation. Requesting police intervention, particularly in cases of this kind, is never a good idea. Sharp was exceptionally fortunate that Officer Tasca was the first to respond: She has years of experience as an EMT and had just completed specialized training
Some experiments that could be done using this working hypothesis: a monogamous mouse pair living alone as control; a polyandrous mouse arrangement with two or more (young) male mice and one female mouse living together so that the female mates with each mouse; a polyandrous mouse arrangement in which the female lives with all of the males but she is allowed to mate with only part of the group for one sexual period and then is allowed to mate with a different part of the group for the next sexual period, always with a rotation and mix-up so that no two succeeding sexual periods have the same “sperm cocktail.” A fourth group could be polyandrous like the third, except that each part of the group that mates with the female will consist of diverse ages: young, middle-aged and old. Then, we could see what kind of children result from these various mating strategies. Also, each of these mice in all of the various arrangements would be taken from monogamous lines, to see if sperm mutations are affected by any arrangement. For the third and fourth arrangements, it may be easier simply to make the ratio of males to the single female quite high, so high in fact that she is incapable of mating with all of the males in a given sexual period, thereby eliminating the need to herd her into one particular group of males (and away from the others) at a time.
“Double Rainbows” from our first ever show- Tiny Creatures with Julia Holter and Pizza!
One of the ironies of this proposal in the so-called jobs bill is that the measure contains infrastructure spending, some $38 billion worth. It would also create an infrastructure bank to fund such projects.
That's the reason I've pretty much stopped posting recipes.
The school with its talented teachers and bright students is a dream for a science and math geek like Jane. She also loves her new friends, including hilarious poetry-spouting rich girl, Mary Violet. But the longer Jane stays at Birch Grove, the more questions she has about the disappearance of another scholarship girl and a missing faculty member.
Anyway, so even though the quilt was for Nanna's shop... Emily had to have at least one sleep under it. And of course... being her oragnising (bossy) self that she is, everyone had to sit down on the quilt and have a bit of a play: Poppy Taylor, Emily, Nanna Taylor, Sophie, Daddy and Lexi.
3. Pleasure (White, Argent) 4:54
A woman in Alaska has been found guilty of "hot saucing" her son. The judge was enraged that the mom did not use "mild".
Because everything is just worse then, right!?
We seek to provide a space for the fusion of aesthetics, sound, and natural living, in an atmosphere of interactive co-creation so we may share in moments that are transformative and inspiring, based in a deep respect for our community and environment.
* disclaimer...my room is not pretty...it is not one that has cost me hundreds to put together...it doesn't have pretty baskets for coordinating boxes...it is just functional, just as I need it to be.
And laugh, that is the best medicine, after all---except when you have to cough---then it really hurts.
According to Fell there are many benefits, starting with the fact that vertical gardens contain smaller beds which require less work to prepare and maintain. The gardens use less soil, fertilizer and water, and don’t attract as many bugs or diseases as ground plants do.
Then over all, (aye! aye!) my little and lengthen’d pennant shaped
My belief is that the "cheese" they use in Hot Pockets is some kind of hot magma held in stasis until the microwave "nukes" it and allows fusion and fission to commence. It was like licking the damned sun.
I feel like I make so many fleeting connections on a daily level. If either one of us were to take the initiative, it could turn into something so much more worthwhile. All I really need to do is to back away from my reclusive tendencies and be more willing to let these connections take their course.
Step 3: Lift up the cutter, insert popper top and pop out the bite-sized pieces!
The old working class area of Nørreport (translating into Northern Gate) is a good base for the beer tourist to Copenhagen. Many of the city's best beer bars are situated in this area and in the adjoining Nørrebro at the other side of Søerne (the Lakes). The connections to and from the airport are also excellent with trains leaving every 10 minutes from Nørreport station. All the local trains (S-trains) as well as the metro stop at this station making it the second hub of the Copenhagen public transport system. In addition, it is a short walk from the main pedestrian streets, called Strøget.
So I choose to go with ebooks but I am a fan of zines. I have made zine in the past, and over the years, have accumulated enough equipment to print and assemble everything myself fairly easily.
I could list many many more blogs that I love and deserve awards. Please check out these blogs and if you like, show them some love. Thank you Melissa!
clove, nutmeg, allspice, ginger (I just sprinkle these over the dry ingredients, it’s probably about 1/4-1/2 t of each )
The owners and coaches depend on these men for their profits and their livelihoods placing their profits and won-loss records above their concern for their employees.
"Fun, fast, and definitely a must read!"
and the lyrics.. *nyomot*
Oettinger Schwarzbier is properly schwarz, with just traces of oakey-brown highlights. It's a delicate old thing really, being a little reticent in giving up its aromas (to be fair, it was probably served far too cold) but it does suggest a touch of cherry and chocolate. Wasn't expecting that!
For some time I have been haunted by a detail in an article about Rwanda that appeared in the New Yorker several years ago. It hints at aspects of the human soul I would prefer not to acknowledge. It is this comment by one of the people who took part in the massacre of Tutsi:
Statistically, also, the black woman is more likely to have a prior record than the white woman, which means she has a higher risk of receiving a custodial sentence if charged with anything. Statistically, she is more likely than the white woman to have already been imprisoned (and therefore more likely to have already suffered abuse within the penal system, and have related PTSD). She is more likely to have a familial history of incarceration and thus be aware of the ramifications it has on black families. Statistically she is more likely to have children than the white woman, and more of them. And if she does have children, hers are statistically more at risk of being taken into state care than any children the white woman may have. It is just a fact that a black woman has more to fear about being taken into police custody than a white woman.
So a few weeks ago I posted about how I put my training plan together . One of the things that I briefly mentioned was that I don’t follow periodization and today I’m going to explain why.
*Understanding/compassion
Perhaps Soho's night life is too vast a subject to be tamed by a single author. Yet, to level this sort of crticism feels churlish. For this reader, Nights Out brought to light many new aspects of London history and proved an engrossing read. I would say it is well worth both your time and money.
The Maloney Team: Bethel Island, CA., A little break from real estate for a bit. I thought I’d get out of town and visit Bethel Island to check out their annual excuse to act crazy, drink beer and watch the catfish races. Here’s some pics that you might enjoy
And sometimes French bureaucracy drives us round the bend
The yesterday is history, the tomorrow is mystery, the today is a Gift.
“Mama Said”
We know that pain reminds this heart
A look at the week we just had:
1. Champions learn everyday and from every experience. Leaders are learners. And life and daily living provide for them an excellent classroom. Champions have a learning bent on life.
to narrow down my style to eclectic modern which includes some traditional pieces.
Starship Sara US
Oh, we could go on but you well know how you ought to behave in your Christian life. Remember those words in Philippians 1:21; “For to me to live is Christ.” Are you bold enough so as to say that, regarding your own life? In other words, can you echo Paul’s testimony from 2 Timothy 4:7? Are you fighting the good fight? Are you finishing your course? Are you keeping the faith? Can you say yes to any of these?
"Whites, Coloureds and Asians would be corralled into demographic pens in all aspects of their economic and professional lives according to the percentage of the population they represent," he said. "The prospects of South African citizens would once again be determined by the colour of their skins - and not by their skills, their contribution."
He said the opposition was using RFS to fish for votes.
Don’t believe UAF/SWP’s lies when it claims to be a ‘peaceful group’ opposed to ‘Islamophobic extremism’.
If he doesn’t have any good answers, or you have already tried talking to him or simply feel like you can’t, maybe you should get the divorce. Just be sure that this is really what you want, and that this is really what is best for you and your family. Before you suggest a divorce I would make sure that you have things in order. Divorces can get ugly and I would hate for you and your children to fall on hard times because you’re trying to get away from a bad situation. Do you have family or friends that you can lean on? Look to your support system for help, and maybe even talk to the people you trust the most before you decide to go through with this, and if you do, talk to them about what you should do next.
A summary of sites included in the BEMR is located in Vol. 1, Fig. 3.1, pages 3.6-3.7, and is slightly different from the listing in Table 4.1. Figure 3.1 lists 150 sites including 3 main catagories: 1. individually reported sites: 107 including 5 sites with no contamination. 2. aggregated sites: 17, included in the cost estimates of other sites. 3. completed sites: 26.
The best cure for pest and disease problems is prevention. Healthy plants resist disease and pest problems. So it is important to purchase plants and seeds that are disease and pest resistant. New varieties with resistance are constantly being added to the market.
Me: Can I help you with something?
A writer friend said, "I don't give any background unless it has some direct bearing on the story. Otherwise readers might ask, 'Why did she put that in the book?'"
Champions work up a sweat and toil relentlessly.
Proving that gore and eyebrows can live together in cinematic harmony is one thing, but does The New York Ripper work as a gripping thriller? Yes and no. Remove the attributes I just mentioned, and all you're left with a pretty standard murder mystery. For example, the stuff revolving around the police investigation, as is usually the case with movies like this, was pretty tedious. Yet, when you take in account the New York setting (lots of great shots of 42nd Street in all its sleazy glory), its generous throng of Italian actresses, and the fact that the killer talks like duck, the film starts to get more and more interesting by the minute.
My favourite Muppet is… The only one I can think of is Kermitt, so it must be him. Great, I like a singing frog. I HATE frogs…
Ham Flower Rolls :
On twitter today, Princess Nowhere, Emily Maguire, Clementine Ford (I keep some impressive internet company, eh?) and I were mocking lots of things, including the whole “every man becomes a feminist when he has a daughter” bollocks. Male journalists/opinion writers seem particularly vulnerable to this problem. And so, The Adventures of Feminist Dad was born…
“‘Meditate’ in Psalm 1 and ‘plot’ in Psalm 2 are the same verb. And it is the same action: a murmuring, absorbed, ruminative interest over the word of God, realizing that this is the important word, the word that determines all existence. But while Psalm 1 directs us to approach this word with delight, receiving it as life-giving, Psalm 2 shows people plotting against this word, devising schemes for getting rid of it so that they can free of all God-interference in their lives. These people want to see God’s words not as javelins penetrating their lives with truth, but as chains that restrict their freedom. They put their minds together to rid themselves of this word so that their words can rule.” (28)
Another famous Kedahan, Tun Daim Zainuddin, has also warmed up to UMNO following some soured years during the Abdullah Badawi regime. The somewhat reclusive Daim has given strategic interviews to the Chinese vernacular papers in the last few months; many think he is trying to help soften the Chinese vote.
Anything crazy, funny, or scary happen while filming MILF?
Those were all good but I have a tie and it seems many others did as well so bear with me. They were both just so different from one another but I couldn’t put either of them down and found my thoughts drifting to them even upon completion.
Hello Everyone!!! For today's project, I was playing around with JustRite's Classic Scallop Borders and ended up creating a fun popstick to decorate a cupcake! :) I had made some Caramel Mud Cake Heart shaped cupcakes and thought this popstick would be perfect for a little decoration!!! ;)
During his imprisonment at Combinado del Este Prison, White was able to fellowship with imprisoned leaders of the persecuted church. After many prayers and letters of appeal from U.S. legislators, Mother Teresa and Christians around the world, White was released to be reunited with his family on Oct. 27, 1980.
Me: Umm…nice, kind, funny. Someone with a great sense of humor who really makes me laugh.
I have it up in the cabinet all the time, but I didn't know this little jar of Cream of Tartar could be used for anything other than whipping up egg whites until I saw a post on Pinterest. I also didn't know that Cream of Tartar is actually an acidic salt that comes from grapes. The acid makes it a wonderful non-abrasive cleaner. Just mix 2 teaspoons vinegar with 2 teaspoons Cream of Tartar and say goodbye to that spotty stainless sink or smeary glass stovetop.
And yet, I get so little done,
Well you've made it this far so let's hope I can keep you interested. My name is April and I live in not so sunny Queensland, Australia. I've been into the lolita fashion since I was 15 but only recently, see 18 *cough* started purchasing and taking it as an actual serious hobby. I prefer OTT sweet or classical sweet looks.
-CB Asante Samuel, like I previously mentioned, was extremely loud and vocal when the defense had a “win” against the offense in both the live hitting portion and the WR vs CB 1-on-1′s. On one occasion, Samuel lined up across from Avant, who tried to do a 15 yard out. Samuel basically ran the route for Avant and knocked the ball away.
I loved the Harry Potter film and am already looking forward to it coming out on dvd and imagining myself curled up on the sofa by the fire this winter watching it again.
boulder reveals a pair of beer goggled eyes in the dark
All the moments since have flown by. It seems like just yesterday she was a little peanut, tucked into the bed between her daddy and me. So comfy cozy there and right at home. We thought it would be impossible to move her to her own crib and, to be honest, we took our time doing that because we liked having her with us. But, she eventually did go to her bed and she did just fine. Now I wish I could have her back.
The real Beauty and the Beast ends with the line, “and their happiness, as it was founded on virtue, was complete.” The Little Mermaid’s happiness only comes when the angels whisk her away to heaven.
Disclaimer: Some of the above have varying levels of language and violence that might be offensive to some, so be sure to check them out for yourself before deciding what's appropriate for you, your kids, etc.
It feel like we haven't moved forward at all, but backward in life. Of course I feel lonely here in NH without him, but I really feel bad for my kids. It takes a toll on them with him away so often. Especially baby K whose favorite person in the world is Daddy.
This has been posted elsewhere in the Internet wilderness, but I think it’s substantially more important than most of the other bullshit out there that I’m reproducing it in full, rather than simply linking to it. Enjoy.
Learn stick-shift
I watched you in silence,
There’s more to Hawaii than flowers and leis, after all – the Hawaiian islands are part of a larger chain, the Polynesian Islands, which include other island cultures such as the Maori and the Samoan, tribal communities with a rich tattoo tradition.
We only speak English at home--true except when the family want to verbally abuse me and speak in French.
Books/movies like:
Madeline Enos – SLA Crew Leader
“You know, you’ll be able to stop me.”
i love them. i love him.
This Snorkel, is an apparently innocuous looking part, which was at first believed to be solely an inlet to cool the cockpit. Several teams add similar inlets in this area to supplement the inlet in the tip of the nose. The cockpit houses the power steering rack, hydraulic lines and electronics boxes, so cooling is often required. However the initially simple inlet has been superceded by at least two more shapely snorkel-like derivatives each with an apparently unnecessarily complex double wall construction creating smooth narrow inlet and a streamlined outer surface. This snorkel has been present ont he car through out all the cold and wet testing sessions, suggestion its purpose goes beyond a simple primary purpose of cooling.
That they should want nothing else more than this life
We had a lovely weekend with our granddaughters (oh yes, and their parents!). Our oldest turned six and had her birthday party Saturday. They have a local park with a picnic pavillion and a "splash pad" and 5 little girls had a wet and wonderful time. The splash pad is free and has all kinds of water fountains that run on a 15 minute timed meter, so that it can used as long as you want by pressing a button. Between that and the playground the party was a great success!
If you enjoy the occasional Guinness, try Milk Stout Nitro. It's the superior choice of the two and costs about the same. Even Little Buddy likes it and he doesn't like much.
And in another hour or so the next evening starts, with us preparing for Siddhartha Bose's Kalagora which is about journeying from the street surrealism of Mumbai to London’s East End via Manhattan. That's at 7pm, ahead of the Trashed Organ event.
This month we did a fundraiser with Scentsy thanks to a sweet, sweet lady! Thanks Kemberly Cooper!
Sellman’s simple act was a drop in the bucket compared to her schedule of volunteer activities. She works as an after school care volunteer at the Minneapolis Indian Center, a special events assistant at the Loft Literary Center, a volunteer marketing director for canine events at the Gunflint Lodge (the real location contained in her children’s book), and a trail staff assistant with Wilderness Inquiry, where she and her husband take disabled children and adults on outdoor adventures throughout the US. They’ve been volunteers with this organization since 1997.
“Where is he?”
It is the story of how our former president Sri Kalam inspires a little boy called chotu to “get an education” for himself, so that the entire Indian Army will one day salute him! He even combs his hair like the president and tells everyone his name is Kalam.
That was not an easy task. It required designing a cover, proofreading and re-proofreading the text of her book, formatting the text, titles, headings, and artwork to fit within CreateSpace's parameters, and doing some desperate magic tricks with software file formats. What a great education! And Betz's determination paid off. Her book is at the printer and will be shipped this week. We can't wait to see it!
Of course in 1 Kings 12, the elders of Israel advised Rehoboam to lighten the tax load on the people after Solomon's expensive reign. One might interpret this as a step to make him more popular, but you'll see as that text progresses that the issue of seeking popularity is the downfall of Rehoboam. He was seeking to be popular among his peers. The elder's goal was less about popularity and more about wisdom of the moment.
AND as an added feature... check out Aloha Friday....
If you've ever seen the movie Airplane!, just picture the scenes where all of the passengers next to Ted Striker are committing suicide to get away from his constantly moving mouth, FOR THE LOVE OF GOD. Andy and I were pantomiming shooting ourselves in the head, hanging ourselves with a rope, drinking straight gasoline, lighting ourselves on fire, and trying to throw ourselves out of the tiny airplane window. Anything to get away from this awful, awful human being.
I am a stay at home mom to 2 boys. My oldest son is ADD and my youngest
As you head south on US 69?
It’s pretty remarkable to see how different the development of each of the babies is. They’re 3 weeks apart (Lil is exactly 3 weeks older than the other babies in the photo), yet some are sitting, some are crawling, some are rolling all over the floor, some are sticking things in their mouth. Their sleep/nap patterns are all totally different. Their eating amounts/types of food/patterns are all different.
The interesting thing about the protest is that it is not instigated or organized by any political parties. It is an organic and spontaneous protest by the people from all walks of life, young and old, men and women and children,Muslims and Christians alike.
As the science of tasting becomes more well-understood, we must confront certain uncomfortable truths: in particular, we aren't so great at it. In blind taste tests, people perform no better than chance at distinguishing good expensive wine from rotgut. Hell, even experienced tasters can't distinguish whether a wine is red or white. So it's no surprise that a new study confirms that people stink at recognizing subtle flavors:
So, do I get it right? Should I be more upfront? Am I too brash and obnoxious? How irritating is it when I blow my own vuvuzela?
The pattern called for a fabric bow to be tied to the hat. While it was cute, I did not particular want that on my placemats, so I have been auditioning different things to put on the Santa cap.
Just about all of the voters we've spoken to (in some underpriveleged areas) have been very receptive and happy to meet us. They know what this presidential campaign is about, they know what this great nation means to them personally, and and we're doing our best to make sure they are committed to getting out and voting in this election.
The story so far:
Chris is the red-headed stepchild of the college campus. Geeky and awkward with no confidence and no social skills, he of course falls for popular sorority president Cindy Cronenberg. In order to get her to take him seriously, Chris convinces his one and only friend J.C. to join him in pledging a fraternity.
Now Legs and Co are dancing to Boney M's Sunny. While I wouldn't want to put Legs and Co out of work, I do feel cheated at not being able to see Bobby dancing around to it.
But what distinguishes MLF from similar micro financing institutions is that they are on the ground with local staff (read: job creation). They are also 78% self sustaining. This means that for the most part they don’t rely on donations or grants to keep their services going. This is because the rate of repayment is high enough that the money gets cycled back into new loans. I was curious on how they accomplish this when they don’t have delinquency fees, late fees, or sign up fees. It all boils down to group liability and a desire to get ahead in life: the loans are given out to a group of women, and those women are jointly responsible for the loan: if Sarah doesn’t pay up her part of the loan, then Annie and I are also responsible for the amount she hasn’t paid back.
When I was younger I did this in a much more obvious manner. I might use my fingers or chewing gum to make marks of how big my teeth had grown (after I lost my baby teeth of course.)
The Bronx's image has been troubled, however, the borough was not as blighted as it appears today. The period from 1920-1950 was documented in The Beautiful Bronx by historian Lloyd Ultan. The book came out in 1979 two years after President Carter visited the South Bronx, a visit that did much to project a negative image of the borough across the nation.
The issue around Afrikaans was a handy stick which the communist propagandists used. They played with the lives and the future of the black students, and today there is a whole generation of blacks who never finished their schooling because they were being used as pawns by the communists. Go to any communist take-over in history and you will see that the one thing a communist regime does not tolerate, is educated people. That is the privilege of the elite.
As I conclude this post, I received a call from "TLC & Assoc," or so my caller ID tells me. Do you think it is the fashion police from What Not to Wear who are going to whisk me away for my crime of wearing holy jeans in public to give me a new wardrobe? I sure hope so.
Upfronts are only a couple of weeks away. That’s when the broadcast networks (remember them?) set their Fall Schedules. At the moment they’re screening and loving all their pilots in Los Angeles. Soon they fly back to corporate headquarters in New York to make their final decisions. And as a wise agent once said about pilots “they all turn to shit over Mississippi.” So it’s hard to speculate on what pilots will get ordered. Plus, you don’t know any of them, so at this point what do you care?
Welcome to the tiniest guest room, under the eaves, ever. I'm still at work on this space, but after the handyman mounted the lights it started looking great! I love the bed tucked into this nook. And the bedding adds some life and eclecticism to a very simple space.
simple and plain, but quite effective I think?
I have written over 100 blog posts, writing over 175,000 words and spending countless hours both in thinking about and crafting these posts. At end of the day, they almost all boil down to one simple message.
I got into the habit of writing to people fairly early and those early experiences of getting friendly replies only encouraged me to write to more people. When it came to doing the school project I described yesterday, it seemed only natural to write to anyone I could find an address for.
Another pause.
Sometimes I like to discuss certain things, if they happen to be on my mind. But if some deep topic isn’t currently on the docket, I tend to completely ignore this blog.
- I taught VBS at First Baptist. It was SO fun! I got to help teach in one of the kindergarten classes. Those were some of the cutest 5 & 6 year olds! It was a great week and a great way to jump into church. We're really enjoying being at FBC. We joined a SS class last week and are hoping to make some new friends soon!
The businesses in Japantown never fully recovered after WWII. Many of the families lost their possessions, businesses and were nominally compensated by the Canadian government 50 years later in the 1980’s, for a token amount of money.
Last week was my birthday week and it was so hard! I ate too many sweets and goodies, which caused me to gain over 5 pounds, which is more than what my baby needed in one week. As a result of my big gain, I have felt guilty and ashamed of the weight that I put on. If I had been able to gain a healthy amount of weight that would have been one thing, but in my mind gaining over 5 pounds in one week is not okay even if I am pregnant!
Arms of a Woman – Hub Hollow
So what do you think? See anything you're dying to have hanging on your closet? Have you already purchased any of these items? Chime in!
The silver ring is attached to the aperture lever, which is hooked onto the inner mechanism makes this work. The aperture shutter is in a part of the camera I currently don't want to take apart, underneath the shutter, which we will see soon. The copper colored rings control the shutter.
Platinum base coat is a white creme polish. I have to be honest, I adore this. My favorite white creme polishes have always been Zoya Snow White and WnW Mad Styles. Platinum base coat is superb.
hollyjollysocial@gmail.com
some may not understand
Then we all dispersed into the cavernous restaurant for yet another go at the buffet. And this time I sat with a woman from Iran, somebody who earlier commisserated with me over the absence of anywhere to walk to, instead of with YJB (whom I didn't catch sight of anyway).
There were lots of reasons I loved this show. Firstly, having never studied the Borgias before, I was blind to any historical inaccuracy and enjoyed the program much more. The Tudors was made by the same company, Showtime, and although I enjoyed it for what it was my knowledge of the period kind of ruined the program for me. Watching this program has given me a desire to learn about both the House of Borgia and the House of Medici; opening my eyes to a new part of history to explore has to be a good thing.
The long and short of it is that I now have 5 1/2 gallons of imperial stout bubbling away. The wort (unfermented beer) tasted fantastic--intensely roasty and intensely bitter, but very smooth. You can't always tell much about the final beer from the wort, but in this case I was encouraged that the wort tasted so smooth, without any harsh bitterness, astringency, or acrid flavors poking out.
Nevertheless, the hotel is nestle between a serene surrounding with a small hill behind it which is just perfect for a retreat. The hotel is just opened not long ago and most of the facilities here are still new.
speak.
3. Be an engaging conversationalist. Smart leaders spend their time starting and advancing conversations within their organization, not running away and hiding from them.
After suffering two miscarriages Dezyama finally gave birth to a lovely daughter, Cherikna Donnasa D. Sangma, (http://www.emerentiana.8m.com/) after 10 years of marriage on 20th February 2009. Sadly, Cherikna passed away after 3.5 months on 9th June 2009, her death shattering their once happy family. The couple adopted a baby boy in 2010 whom they named Jakrim Jordano D. Sangma. Dezyama conceived again in February 2011. She was admitted to Holy Cross Hospital on 1st November 2011 and taken to the operation theatre for a Caesarian section at around 5:05pm. A healthy baby boy was born at around 6pm. Dezyama was later taken to ICU and developed breathing problem at around 2:50am, and slowly slipped into a coma. Dipu was notified at around 3:25am and rushed to the hospital. Dezyama fought on and tried hard to breathe for about 12 agonising hours during which time she suffered a total of four massive cardiac arrests, before she finally passed away at around 3:00pm on the afternoon of 2nd November. Dipu is totally devastated. She did not have heart or any other major diseases, but she did have Hemoglobin E deficiency disease.
I will come back to this topic: Rupert Lockwood deserves a post to himself, as does Wilfred Burchett.
Have you ever woken up with cotton-mouth? How about a sore throat? How about something hanging out of the back of your throat that feels like one of those sticky octopus things you used to get out of a vending machine that you would throw against the wall and it would climb down? No? Well, all you have to do is drink some beer that doesn't mix with your body or your internal food processing mechanisms and voila, you've got it!
12 If written contract or other documentation setting out conditions of engagement please provide a copy
Gary Groot – CUC Board Representative; Western Region
Fact Seven: School is the best place to prepare kids for the real world.
Nederland - Dirk Kuyt
Wow, see how thoughts build and spiral, mentally attacking myself? No wonder I cried. I am my own bully. I guess my dad fed those thoughts to me daily, so it is hard to stop them from forming. When I recognize them, I can easily stop them, but when too many things happen, or it involves my kids, the reactions are stronger. My mommy protection kicks in and sends those negative thoughts into overload.
so often looked at that the pages are falling out tattered and worn?
“Things will get pushed back.” And by “things,” I don’t mean anything in my personal life.
Why were my sales so low at this fair?
And if you don't live close by or can't make it, FEAR NOT! I am going to offer instructions by email and/or a kit so you can still enjoy making this album yourself in the comfort of your own home. Just keep an eye on my website and I'll let you know when the info is ready!
Shirt: Anne Fontaine
My soul finds rest in God alone; my salvation comes from him. He alone is my rock and my salvation; he is my fortress, I will never be shaken.
“The next day the large crowd that had come to the feast heard that Jesus was coming to Jerusalem. So they took branches of palm trees and went out to meet him, crying out, “Hosanna! Blessed is he who comes in the name of the Lord, even the King of Israel!” And Jesus found a young donkey and sat on it, just as it is written,
Sarah Weaver wasn't looking forward to starting at an all-girls school. But that was before she met Maddy. Maddy and her best friend, Agnes, are fun and rich and interesting-and for some reason, they seem to really like Sarah. Before long, Maddy and Agnes have moved Sarah into a big house off campus, where they cook together, buy each other presents, and share each other's secrets. So why does Sarah feel like something's bizarrely wrong? As more and more cracks start to show in Maddy's and Agnes's perfect veneers, Sarah notices some strange and disturbing things: Maddy's compulsive lying, Agnes's obsession with Maddy, and the deterioration of their friendship. And just when Sarah begins to question her own sanity, things turns deadly.
Now the rain has returned and we are having another enforced break. Luckily it's just a general drizzly damp rain come windy fog and not another downpour. So hopefully no further damage... Meanwhile I have some kale and tatsoi ready to be planted out, But I don't know where I'm going to put it...
Now I tell you, what kind of dumb question is that.
You can't leave it out.
I even tried to make her look like she was carrying a wand or sparkler. lol! Well I hope you are enjoying this wonderful festive holiday! Please be safe and make every moment count! HAPPY 4TH OF JULY! Till next time...Be good to each other! Hugs!
Schenck was arrested for violating the Espionage Act of 1917. Pardon the ignorance of me, my dictionary, and the general usage of 99% of the English speaking world, but I always thought espionage was, by its very nature, something done in secret, not by distributing thousands of pamphlets. I always thought it involved giving information to your enemies, not your opinions to your fellow citizens.
a) Israel
It’s up there on the top shelf.
1.) Sherlock, Jr. (USA, 1924)
Robert Siodmak’s film takes Ernest Hemingway’s short story (and it’s a very short story) and uses it merely as the jumping off point. The rest of the movie follows insurance investigator Reardon (Edmond O’Brien) as he tries to find out why the Swede ended up in a small New Jersey town waiting passively to greet a hail of bullets. The story is revealed by a succession of characters who had known the Swede, and a number of flashbacks gradually piece together all the events that brought about his demise. The Swede starts off as a medium grade fighter who, after breaking his hand and ending his career, begins the slow descent into the criminal underworld. This culminates in a payroll heist, the aftermath of which leads to the eventual downfall of just about everybody involved. The character of the Swede is basically a good-natured oaf whose desire for easy money allows him to be dazzled and duped by the grasping and predatory Kitty Collins (Ava Gardner). In a sense the whole film is as much about Kitty as anyone else; as we see her manipulations provide the catalyst for the betrayals that litter the story.
Other specifications include a single-core 1.3GHz processor, 512MB of RAM, 16GB built-in storage, USB-on-the-Go, Bluetooth 3.0, HSDPA 14.4Mbps, HSUPA 5.76Mbps, Wi-Fi N with DLNA, GPS and A-GPS, stereo FM radio, and even NFC.
The show is only 11 episodes and the pacing is quite amazing. Although the show tend to get off-track once in a while by showing events that are while interesting and related to the main plot, but are immediately dropped in the next episode. The show also feels a bit rushed towards the end, as Poppo and Tsuruko only get some developments very, very late.
to fall
And then: A quarter century later, Channing returns to Broadway in a re-tinkered version of 'Blondes' called 'Lorelei'. It was actually a bigger hit, in part to the genius lyrical contributions of 'Applause's Compton and Green.
The 9:15 math class was trying. There was a dead bird in the room that kept disrupting class, though I'm sure it would've chosen to die elsewhere if it had known what a ruckus it would cause. The boys could not sit still at all. I ended up keeping some of them through the break and re-teaching the lesson. Graded papers during my break and turned in the final exam with answers to the curriculum coordinator. They collected them in manila envelopes (each one labeled with a specific grade and subject).
The subject of the names that go on those entry forms are a whole other topic. I addressed it a little bit here, but I'll save the bigger rant about that for another post.
Details to follow along with pictures. We will have our game faces on.
So, off they went, but only halfway, when the scorpion stung the frog. "Why?" gasped the dying frog, as he slipped beneath the waves.
8am to Birmingham New Street
Or. What about a triology. Where you don't have to wait months for the next one to be published. Don't you just love finding a completed series after the whole thing has been published? You ought to try the "Neanderthal Parallax" (Hominids, Humans, Hybrids). It tells the story of a parallel earth where the neanderthals are the hominids that are dominant. And somehow a bridge between these worlds opens. There are chasms in the differences. Yet. There is shared "humanity."
What can wash away my sins? asks one such hymn.
The whole story has a sort of dreamy feel. I do think that I liked the scenes that took place in heaven the best. Emily and Matt are taught by some of the archangels who are sometimes very human seeming and funny. I liked when Emily turned St. Mark into a lizard. I liked that the saints kept coming up with phrases that are well-known and saying that they think they will catch on.
WMSKSTLSPORTS
Back in January, Heidi and Seal announced that they would be getting divorced after 6 years of marriage. They never discussed what caused the split and signed non-disclosure contracts so any dirty details will stay between them. But Heidi didn’t stay on the market for long.
Sir Bridge Climber got an early start and by 10:30am or so, the neighborhood was buzzing with news of Brooklyn's Spider Man. NYPD Emergency Services Units were quick to respond as was a helicopter circling over head.
Is the quality really there, or just the label?
“It’s going fine,” the manager says. “When I’m on the court and I see the ball speeding toward me, my brain immediately says, ‘To the corner! Back hand! To the net! Smash! Go back!’”
“Double Dip”
I've largely given Eli a pass this season regarding his high number of interceptions based solely in my opinion that he'll do more to win me a game, than lose one. He's my guy and I'm a loyalist that way. But there's no escaping many of his high passes have resulted in tipped balls this season, which in turn resulted many times in an interception. Another select group of interceptions I have blamed Coach Gilbride and poor, unnecessary play selection, like that one against the Redskins in the end-zone.
Strew the “capers” in salads, use them in tartar sauce, make compound butters, season tapenade with them. They’re versatile, they’re cheap, and they’re a bit of the 17th century you can bring to your own table as easy as pie. Or, rather, pye.
Customizable start menu in Windows 8
The steak is overdone, his fault for being late. He eats it slowly, nodding along to the few things she says. Telling her that he’s tired, that he has a few more things to do before bed. It takes him an age and his jaw is tired by the end of it, but he finishes his meal and kisses her before he shuffles off to his office.
We had the beer dinner coming up, so I alerted Tank. We wanted to try to incorporate as much different stuff as we could. For the pork, he thought it would be good and easy to incorporate bacon in one of the dishes. So he grabbed 10 pounds of bacon right away.
From Jaibalito: Catlin, Ian, Carol, and Hans
On the other hand, I’ve been buying lots of examination reviewers and novels in the bookstore. I’ve been trying to have the courage to buy a BL novel in Tsutaya and Kuchiki but I’ve been a regular customer there usually in my jr. high school uniform and I highly doubt the tenchou will sell sekaiichi hatsukoi’s newest volume to an underage like me.
In an upcoming book to be published by The Straits Times in January, Lee reveals that in her last days, “I’m the one she recognises the most. When she hears my voice, she knows it’s me.”
Who do I follow that I would nominate?
Background: Yin and Yang
Anyone else over worked and under paid by comparison to the way things were in the before time?
Consider, for example, the assertion from Macpherson when summing up Mr and Mrs Lawrence’s views: ‘Any protestation that Mr & Mrs Lawrence’s attitude stems from perception and not reality must be abandoned’ (para, 4.9). Why, “must”, one asks? And are the assessments of white police officers based on reality or just perception? This is not the way one conducts an objective and impartial inquiry: this is how one treats heretics whose “guilt” has been determined in advance.
A woman in a blue scarf
Its challenge time at Kenny K for team B so I started out with this image b/c it was fave from Kenny K's new images just released last week. Shes a cowgirl so of course Im going to color mostly browns b/c our challenge this week was monochromatic. Well as I got everything colored I couldnt figure out another brown color I wanted to use for her top so I decided to give it just a pop of color and stick with mono for the card base. Okay so image is colored so I went looking for a some choc chip dp designs and came across this retired dp from SU. I dont remeber what the name of it was (maybe outlaw) but its the dp that matches the Wanted stamp set so of course now the wheels are turning and I go pull out that set. Now at this point a song keeps playing over and over in my head and its a song by a girl named Jessie James (LMBO!). This song actually used to be my ringtone when my hubby called. So b/c of that then I start making this card for him for a little fun. Since I know now this is for my hubby I started distressing some layers and embossed one of the layers with distressed stripes ef (note: dont distress then run it thru cuttlebug b/c then your dp is VERY easily torn b/c your distressed edges get flattened out in the cuttlebug so emboss first distress 2nd!LOL!) I stamped the medallion from the Wanted set onto the cs tone on tone then embossed it using the stars folder. So by now I've got all the dp layers attached and I have my ribbon and button on. When I put my image against the card it still needs something so I grab the wanted sentiment and hope it fits...good enough so I stamped it off twice and then onto the image. Great!! Now at this point I drop the stamp and have a brown smudge at the top of my dp so now we have stars there and I added one at the bottom just for a little balance. I decided then she had to have some bling so I added some rhinestones to the stars and the twine. Done! Yayy!! Now the reason for my story is this....I took pic of my card done the editing all that fun stuff and so proud of how my card turned out go to load into challenge forum for KK only to realize that ummmm....it was supposed to be a monochromatic CHRISTMAS card!!LOL!! Those blond roots must sure be deep!LOL!! So I hope you enjoyed my monochromatic NON Christmas card! I'll list copic colors below but I wanted to share this song with you since I've sang it all day on the post below. Have a great one!!
FOUND ‘EM!!!
Would you assist other with contacts etc
But in the beauty rising within them
Blog Waltz ALERT: We hope that you will join in the fun for our Friends of Waltzingmouse Stamps Blog Waltz. This fun Blog Waltz happens this coming Wednesday-August 17. Our theme this month is Tea and Coffee and we are all anxious to see the wonderful inspiration from the players. Click on the link above to take you to the forum thread to get all the details. Prizes are up for grabs and it’s sure to be lots of fun, we hope to see you there.
PSH PSH PSH PSSSSSSSSSSSSSHHHHHHHHHHHHHH… PSSSSSHHHHH…. PSSSH… PSH.
So I decided to step out of the box and give it a try. I'm in a new phase of my life; it's fitting I try new things, right? I mean, you'll never get ahead, or learn anything new, or experience anything exhilarating if you do the same ole, same ole and stick to the comfortable and mundane, right? Oh, don't worry, I'm not about to do anything too crazy like going skydiving, getting a sex change, or eating Vegemite. But I've lived in Chicago my entire life, and after forty years, I think I can handle taking the L.
Emme and Ethan are perhaps the two characters with whom we spend the most time, their relationship consisting of deep friendship (and unrequited love on Ethan’s part) the most emotional of the four threads woven together to create this beautiful patchwork of a story. Emme is endearingly naïve and a genuinely good person, always the first to help any of her friends should they need it, and utterly unsuspecting of any type of subterfuge or petty jealousy to the extent that we often want nothing more than to reach in and force her eyes open wide so she can see what everyone else around her already does. Her eyes do eventually open much to our immense relief, and once they’re open they remain blissfully clear and she never allows her vision to be clouded by a manipulative farce of a friend again. She goes from a meek, quiet young woman content to her place in the shadows to a strong and confident young woman who’s still plagued by nerves, but who no longer allows herself or those around her to stand in her way.
I stay home to watch: Singers, musicians, jesters and The Sopranos
1. Pretty Girl 2:55
It was a perfect fit .
Therefore, take a smaller timeframe somewhere between 12 and 36 months. Develop a flexible 36-month plan, that’s three years not five. Take a sheet of paper and describe the key elements of what you’d like your department to do, be, and look like at the end of 36 months (3 years) – people, processes, technology, services, skills/capabilities, training, and customer base (internal/external). Document this and use it to judge new opportunities and directions to see how well they fit. This is the first step to take in strategic planning.
Though the Ministry of Education is the administrator of Sun Xu’s scholarship, it has adamantly refused to revoke it and pass the baton to NUS instead.
Did you even spot one Sugar Nellie card in there?
The mare's hooves/with E.W. shoes have become a study for THERMOGRAPHY outcomes and EASYWALKER horseshoes. The barefoot trimmer( um, yea, you read that right) I have, that set the Sports Medicine Horseshoes wants more to offer her clients, since hoof boots are NOT always the answer...I know!
Do you see the lesson I learned, the one that every American boy must learn? The formula is simple: a) dominate the girls and b) fight other boys. It’s never good for a boy to do a girly thing, but, if you must, you had better be better at it than any girl, and you had better be willing to punch any boy in the face who says that doing it makes you a girl. This formula worked for me, I am sorry to report. It’s worked for millions of American men of my generation. And even as we’re were being trained to fear the queer, we were at the same time watching heterosexuality, in the form of our parents’ marriages, disintegrate before our very eyes.
To work again with such talented fun actors as I did in ’21 Jump Street’!
Is there a doctor in the house?
to his humble abode in Ho Chi Minh City. What a good man he is... :)
So for this month’s card here are the requirements.
This is one from just outside the church from yesterday’s shot. This is the cemetery for Trinity Church. These tombstones are a few centuries old now. The middle gravestone of the three at the bottom right of the image reads, “In memory of Ann Bradshaw who departed this life January 8th, 1819, aged 11 years, 1 month, 21 days ——— Also Charls II, son of Charls & Jane Shamburgh, who departed this life February 22nd, 1819, aged 1 year 10 days.”
A quick easy environmentally friendly "mircle" grow food!
In the face of this, what are we as educated people called to be and do? What resources of our knowledge can we bring to bear on this apparently intractable predicament? What shall we do as we seek together to build understanding in our communities? There are many that we can do. One of them is to aware people about diversity as one of nature’s facts that God creates. We can start with our family, neighborhood and our communities at any opportunity of sharing or discussion.
Gary Spain, I think this room was destined to be mine! xo, Crystal
The wrong place is wherever it slows down pace, interrupts action, and bores the reader into leaving the book.
My one point is that as you become a parent, I don’t think you are prepared for the emotional aspect of it. Of course most people tend to expect that they will love their children, but knowing that, and experiencing it are two different things. It is like having an idea about what love is about between two people. It might be a good idea, but it is never quite the same as experiencing it, having your insides spun or turned upside down, or even torn apart.
Revi:
The Fencing Master (Le Maître d’armes, 1840)
In this way, you could just as easily commit to Buddhist principles to achieve the same end. The 4 Noble Truths give you a starting point, and the 8-fold path is a system, which will bring about balance and authenticity. Again, no belief in anything mystical is actually required. And if the commitment is there to the system, over time, the brain actually rewires itself (click here for a 4-minute interview with the Buddhist Matthieu Ricard on a BBC News radio programme, after his brain was scanned by MRI machines).
Oh, how long before you
Tuesday and all is well. Well, other than its over 80 degrees outside. That is not so well. I am making it, however. I firmly believe that temperatures will normalize. When? Even the wisest cannot tell.
Sunbathing fly
Slay ‘em in the middle
I have purple, lavender, speckled purple on white, white, and yellow.
Registration required 610-353-1022
And oh my goodness, wait until you see what fun things the other design team gals have come up with, go check it out! For my DT card I did a 5x7 swing card using the Mini Monsters and Martha Stewart All Occasion cartridges. Details for my card are below, thanks for looking and I can't wait to see your cards!
If your are aspiring to the middle-class, and your have the resources, it would be better for your to look beyond California for you future. You can return after the economic collapse and help us survivors rebuild this once great state.
So, are you up to it? Let’s be branded! Let’s change what being narrow minded is and prove that maintaining positive focus buffers your dreams against breakage. Let’s prove that we CAN accomplish anything if we focus on what we want and stop worrying. It’s tough and it takes effort but nothing worth getting was ever achieved without effort. What an awesome reward for your effort: reaching your goals and having the life you want. We can so let’s do it. JUST START!
#114 Tracey MacDonald
I am thankful that my husband cleaned the kitchen and dusted without being asked this past Monday!
It is through these amazing mini-powerhouse-chakras that our physical body receives the energy to perform healing inside of itself. Our mental attitudes are not detached from our physical behavior, such as our tone of voice, the way we look at things, the way we judge and react to our immediate reality; everything is influenced by our endocrine system because they act directly over our sensorial system.
Super 8
Table 1 – Social Media Measurements
I want to find a place where Errol Flynn had sex and have kinky sex with my girlfriend on that very spot.
But it doesn't stop the pain
So, here are the pieces I am extremely excited to show you which I made for this week:
I screwed up cooking this hoagie. It’s burned on the outside and totally cold on the inside. How do you fuck up a hot dog?
Not what one would expect, but amusing, nonetheless, an image of Cecil Beaton up a ladder flinging down paint to create the design for the splattered, splotched carpet that covered the floor at Raffles. More expected, perhaps, is the idea of him and his aide Robert LaVine* touring Second Avenue in a limousine looking for antiques to decorate the club. Beaton, still in his My Fair Lady Edwardian manner, created an interior lit, or so it looks at this remove, with the glow from many a table-side flambé.
When they reached Wellington Street the man was standing waiting in front of them. He then approached the women, grabbed the 21-year-old and indecently assaulted her. Her friend tried to intervene and managed to call for help before the man ran off in the direction of West Regent Street.
Here's yet another reason why I love the Internets.
Since the protestation makes no sense, the only conclusion I can make is that they were determined to be against him no matter what, which is... dare I say it, the most un-American thing of all. The notion that a person is automatically wrong because they may represent a viewpoint that they are told doesn't mesh with what their ideals should be... it's so fucking convoluted and dumb, and monarchist. That's right. I said MONARCHIST.
The last of the wedding invitations all ready for assembly to the back, little diamante hearts (I had to order more when numbers changed hence the delay) are all threaded onto aubergine ribbon - amazingly fiddly too:( At the front some House Mouse decoupage - mostly ready assembled too - so I can whip up a card today for Rudolph Day/week over at Sandra's here.
Finding the proper dance floor for your night club can be a real pain and it is very obvious that the kind of product that you select will not only make the night club but it can break the night club too. Back in the days, transportable dance floors were all the craze, well, times have changed and these days, LED technology is surely the big hit in lighting and some of the most popular dance floors are certainly of this type.
Right now, you need to step back and give this query some breathing time. At least two weeks. Don't read the comments (in fact, I'm going to shut them down). Just let this percolate for awhile.
Senta - Catherine Nagelstad
What does it mean to be “responsible” for education? The government funds education, but it does so by giving the Councils money to spend; the Council doles this out to schools, usually based on the number of teachers and pupils they have (my mother used to do this for a living, apparently it’s very long winded and complex). The curriculum, what the teachers actually have to teach, is controlled by the government, though.
What will they look like?
117Share
2. Mayawati the megalomaniac – Where’s the propriety?
Back Up Goal: 1:45
It was today that I formulated another theory as to why I’ve been feeling so good, and why it started with thoughts of my fiancée. Perhaps the abstract importance that we place on fifth time April 20 has passed with us being together had something to do with it. I was late the day of April 20 because I stopped at my fiancée’s work to give her flowers. I told this to my boss and she said, ‘you’re not even married yet!’ and two of the older people I work with laughed. It was over the fact that we celebrate the anniversary of our first date with a reverence that I suppose is supposed to be saved for the anniversary of the ‘big day.’ The wedding. This is an interesting generational divide. Those laughing down at us from their aerie of experience saying, oh you two stupid little love bird, hee hee hee, wait til you’re 20 years in and three children larger as a unit, har har har. I appreciate this sentiment, but also grimace at their clear ignorance of both my personal situation and their observation of the current culture.
– The best pass of the scrimmage was thrown by Luke Caldwell, who is a receiver. It was a really nice pass, though. Just like the Samford game last season, it went Caldwell-to-Rickey Anderson, who this time caught it in stride. Anderson seems to be good at making those downfield catches, which can’t be said for every running back. Kevin Higgins will undoubtedly try to take advantage of that.
"Inigo Pipkin" - or "Pipkins" as it became known by the time I was aware of it - was actually my favourite programme as a toddler. If forced to articulate the reasons now I'm not sure I could tell you why. I wasn't really capable of intellectualising why the content of "Pipkins" was superior to "Rainbow" back then, and if you'd ask me I'd probably have said something about some of the puppets being funny. Love it I did, though, and as an adult viewer now the show has obviously taken on added dimensions. I wouldn't have known what "camp" was as a four year old, much less been able to tell you that's what Hartley Hare was, and nor would I have appeciated the fact that the puppets were rather moth-eaten beasts, a fact numerous YouTube commenters have since leapt up to point out.
Couple of months later I took Steven back in again plus his new loser friend Kevin.
After weeks of this attitude, I was so irritated that I began to dread class. I gave myself a talking-to. There was a lot of internal yelling and cat-fighting involved, but eventually the editor within reigned supreme. I reviewed my past work and made the changes she suggested and would you believe that my work got better? They weren’t big changes, as I said, but small things that improved the overall quality and clarity of my features.
Simple things!
-Old Pajamas
3. ‘The moon is to be revered. Hail the moon Gods. Those not hailing the moon Gods will be punished in the following ways.’
Well, it’s time to get done things done today. I’ve relaxed, or chillaxed enough. Doesn’t feel like it, but the clock says it, so I reckon it’s true.
My little sister just finished her freshman year of college. She had her finals this week and is moving back home for the summer. I am JEALOUS. As I sat at work all week and pouted because all of the college kids were about to be out for summer with no worries in the world, I realized how much I wish I'd done things so much differently. I wish I would have majored in something else. Don't get me wrong, I am so happy that I graduated with my Bachelor's. I have been so thankful that I got a job immediately after college, and it has been a wonderful experience! Here's the kicker.... I am not passionate about what I do. I feel like I should wake up every morning and WANT to go to work. I should LOVE what I do!
If you would like to win these gorgeous ribbons..then all you need to do is become a follower of the blog,for every 100 followers we get we will draw a winner so please pass the details on the more followers the more candy and the more chances to win,leave your name with Inlinkz below and when we hit that magical 100 followers we will get Random Org to draw a winner so it could be you and should we get to 200 followers well we'll draw another winner and so on.....
In a narrative, things, social units, locations, ideas & beliefs, (both explicit and implied), can all be actants. Let’s call them Object-Actants (O-A). A “character” in a narrative is both an O-A, and a receptacle and carrier of multiple O-A’s. An O-A may be in itself, autonomous, but still a part in a larger whole, as the cells and organs of an organism exist both as parts, and objects in themselves. Dependency in the relationship, then, indicates limits of freedom, but does NOT determine independence of identity.
Hope you all have a great evening!!
So what's new in the boutique this week?
Ada McGrath (Hunter) is a mute that has not spoken since she was six years old. She is set to be married to Alisdair Stewart (Sam Neill) who she had never seen. She has to move across the sea to New Zealand with her daughter, Flora (Anna Paquin) in tow. The boat she is traveling in is packed with crates of clothes, household items and her cherished piano.
When you're ready to bake the crackers, heat the oven to 350 degrees. Slice the dough into rounds about 1/4 quarter inch thick, or thinner if you prefer.
Okay so I know when I'll be back but can't wait to get there and enjoy the creative juices.
Gorgeous although hard to capture it in a photograph!! I LOVE how this turned out and it just shows that you shouldn’t be afraid to play and get messy.
Finally, the basement had an extraordinary collection of religious artwork from about the twelfth century onwards from Ireland and parts of Europe. There were a ton of crucifixes and chalices, and an extravagant Bishop’s crosier.
Stir Frying
I have one more detail from my daughter's recent Cake Decorating Party I'd like to share... the pretty rainbow backdrop. I like experimenting with a variety of props and backgrounds for my party/dessert tables, and in the past I've used banners, fabric, and paper lanterns to accent my displays. For my daughter's birthday this year, I wanted something that was colorful and fun, yet easy and inexpensive. I've seen pretty fabric and ribbon backdrops and thought I could get a similar look with inexpensive crepe paper. I bought 5 colors of crepe paper (at Hobby Lobby) for around $1 each, hung them on a ribbon "line" behind the dessert table, and I love the way it looked! I'm sure I'll play around with this idea again. It's a great way to bring in the colors of a party and fill a blank wall, for very little money.
It was inevitable that the Orders of Fraternity should sponsor world education. (…) The program included a systematic expansion of existing institutions and the enlargement of their spheres of influence.
Here I am in the second week of October still recovering from all the excitement of September. My cute 50 year old husband is not showing any signs of slowing down, and yet he has hit that landmark birthday that most people celebrate with Black!
In a bowl, toss the short ribs with flour, salt and pepper. In a large pot, heat oil and brown the short ribs on all sides. Remove short ribs from pot. In the remaining oil, saute shallots. Once they are soft, add the meat back in and add the wine. Cook over medium heat until the wine is halfway reduced, about 10 minutes. Add beef stock, thyme, tarragon, carrots, turnips and celery and reduce heat, cooking meat until it is very tender (about 1.5 hours). Add chopped potatoes and cook for an additional 45 minutes to an hour, until all vegetables and meat are completely tender. Season with additional salt and pepper as desired.
CNN en Espanol’s Juan Carlos Lopez has a guest there.
Plato and Aristotle hold respective versions of the form-matter distinction, the view that basic ontology includes both form and matter. Plato’s version is patently dualist. He holds that form is primary being, that it is mind- and matter-independent, and that formal being acts on material being such that matter can only be said to be something to the degree that it is involved in form. Aristotle, objecting to what he saw as Plato’s ontological promiscuity, argued that substance, a union of matter and form, was primary being. Among other advantages this resolved the interaction problem that afflicts Plato’s dualism. On the other hand, the price of collapsing matter and form together into substance in this axiomatic way was that one had to accept that primary being was heterogeneous. This is counter-intuitive, but that doesn’t make it wrong. Close attention to Aristotle’s metaphysical differences with Plato is rewarded with any number of insights into subtleties of the mind-body problem (for example notice the resonance with Spinoza). We will return to Aristotle and De Anima, his own great work on the philosophy of mind, in Chapter Four.
And then he creeps on her.
In a microwave safe bowl add chocolate and butter--microwave on high until melted and smooth. In a bowl add eggs--beat. Add white sugar--stir. Add melted chocolate--stir. Add flour, baking powder and salt--stir. Add chopped pecans and vanilla--stir. Pour batter into a greased 8 x 8 square baking pan. In a bowl add milk, coconut and brown sugar--stir. Spread the coconut mixture evenly over the batter. Bake at 350 degrees for 25-30 minutes--test with a toothpick for doneness.
Why is it called the harvest moon? Because it's light is so bright that it allows farmers to work later into the night - by moonlight - and get their crops harvested before time ran out and winter set in.
(This will be my last full Mary post,,,,,it's going to be a long haul, after this, I'll just give updates at the bottom of my posts,,,,,,or on Facebook)
Not only that but there is a cafe, a bar and even music.
In separate larger bowl, whisk together sunflower oil, golden syrup, egg, milk & buttermilk. Add dry ingredients using a spoon (a mixer won't be helpful here because of the petals) until just incorporated. Pour into loaf tin and bake until a toothpick comes out clean - it may take anywhere from 30 to 45 minutes or onward, depending on your oven.
Comic books! Ha! I said "comic books"; not "graphic novels". COMIC BOOKS! COMIC BOOKS! COMIC BOOKS!!!!
Anyways, I gave it to her yesterday and I "THINK" she liked it a lot! :-)
Hawkshaw
If you have received two notifications saying that I’ve updated and only find one update–consider yourself lucky.
The winner (chosen by the random generator thing) of the Remember Me chart is Laurie! Thanks to all who entered the drawing and for everyone that takes the time to leave a kind word :)
So you heard it here first, folks. CBS has chosen a replacement for Charlie Sheen in Two and a Half Men. It is I. I'm going to start practicing my drinking and snorting and shooting and general douchbaginess.
Far away across the sea in America the cities are filled with naked people. Men women and children stark naked going about their daily lives. Except for a few who see nakedness in public as missing a few sandwiches to go on a picnic. They understand that sin’s entrance into the world caused God to make clothes for his creatures. They wear clothes as man has been doing since he was kicked out of Eden by God.
1 Reptile 3:47
4. Get Beret
Supporters of Julian Assange say they fear that his extradition to Sweden for alleged sex crimes will pave the way for a future appearance in an American court.
File Under ;;; Oi Punk Kings
11 The Lady's In Love With You
I just can’t believe how lucky we are. I have an amazing, loving ,sweet, beautiful and talented sister whom I am sooooo proud of ! The future is looking bright. She might be in the spotlight, but behind her are our loving parents who have welcomed me, my children and my husband into their family as if we have always been together. A great mom who acted just like a mom would at our wedding. A father, who I feel like I related to the most and a great brother who my son A-D-O-R-E-S ! I kind of like him too. We even have matching tattoo’s now. We got them in Amsterdam. My wedding present from him. Sweet!
But I do not know why still the sunset is more charming and influential and
“I have to admit that when I was first introduced to the topic, I too was amused at the job description.”
Today's fabrics hail from a line of personally designed, hand printed textiles developed by artist/designer Bonnee Sharp, for Studio Bon. The silk screened patterns are beautiful in their simplicity and graphic punch, adding the perfect bit of zip to a staid antique or traditional room, but equally comfortable on a modern piece or in a more contemporary setting.
Amendment which inserted Part XIV-A to the Indian Constitution provided nothing more than substituting courts for specialized tribunals in certain matters. The result, tribunals become another wing of the Executive. The courts left with no choice, deciphered vague norms on judicial propriety for tribunals from the doctrine of separation of powers. Although, initial pronouncements date back to 1950s, the Government is yet to formulate any uniform policy on tribunals. In the past three years alone, four tribunals have been held unconstitutional and few others are queued up before courts across the country facing similar charges.
Up last this week is Cindy Haffner. Cindy is using the City of David stamp set. Cindy used one of the solid distressed pieces of paper from the basicgray collection. She stamped the City of David image, then stamped it again. The entire city is cut out and popped up to create a wonderful dimensional scene. I love the colors as it makes it look like an evening sky. Cindy also stamped and popped up one of the sentiments in the set. Beautifully done, Cindy!!! Cindy is also reminding us that it is never to early to start working on some Christmas cards!!!
We'll start with the Goobers, roasted peanuts covered by milk chocolate. The individual bag is 1.38oz and the label brags this has "5 grams of protein," the same amount of saturated fat by the way. 1.38oz in this case is 46 peanuts, some of them doubled up and held together by the milk chocolate. Obviously these are crunchy but also the roasted peanut flavor is the final flavor though the chocolate is the initial burst you get. These are not salty at all so it tasted a lot like a peanut butter with chocolate added to it. It is made with both cocoa mass and cocoa butter so this is the real deal and for a mass produced candy it had a lot fewer added ingredients and preservatives than I thought it might. I discovered the Goobers were introduced to the USA in 1925 by the Blumenthal Chocolate Company, a Philadelphia based family company started in 1911 by two brothers. Many of their creations became and continue to be movie theater treats; that is how I know Goobers. Nestlé makes the candy today after acquiring the mother company in 1984.
Three weeks ago, Morning 9:30AM
I started them out with Popsicles. It was the only photo of them all together I could get. Then I quickly herded them to the bedroom and closed us in. We were having a great time giggling and playing with the toys until I noticed little Michael had something in his hands. It was two handfulls of tampons!!! I confiscated them and found the source and as I was taking care of that, I heard a scream. I turned around and found Anthony taking a big bite out of poor little Jaileigh who had gotten stuck with him in the tunnel tube! As I was soothing and distracting them, Amber came home. Phew! We survived!
Hello my dear people! It's been 10 days again since I've posted something and even that one was a scheduled post so it's been even longer since i've actually been blogging or checking your wonderful works of art you're doing with the varnish and the nail. My older (and regular) readers probably know this from last year, May and June are months when I really need to shift into fifth gear when it comes to studying. This year the stakes are even higher, thanks to my ambition to get the highest marks and the fact that I'll be leaving for Spain in the middle of June for one week. Thus I have to pass the planned exams before I departure.
except to conquer and understand
“Oh, don’t excuse yourself to me, unless you wish to embitter my shame. I’m obliged to you for offering to share your destitution with me. I must try to run my face with the landlord,” said Colville.
The boys will competing in the LCAAA Tournament at Avon Lake Friday and Saturday against all Lorain County Teams!!
I love vintage, especially the 1940’s era. The hair, the clothes, the music all make up a little bit of a passion for me!
More problematic is the case of performers (actors). Section L.212-4 of the Intelelctual Property Code provides for an irrebuttable presumption of assignment of exploitation rights in the audiovisual work in favour of the producer. Assuming the Luksan pinciples apply beyond the narrow case of the principal director (not an unreasonable assumption) to the case of performers and their related rights, this statutory provision is incompatible with EU law.
The Capital Ambition guide to behaviour change was put out by The Young Foundation and produced by the London Collaborative. Now, Capital Ambition seems to be a worthy effort to avoid duplication of services and to share spare capacity across public bodies in London. Apparently unable to simply get on with the job Capital Ambition commissioned The London Collaborative which was to;-
Those who know me well know that I need absolutely no excuse to expound on the color pink (you'll note this blog's title). But since it is National Breast Cancer Awareness Month, I thought I would follow Mrs. Blandings' fabulous lead and do my bit to raise awareness by blogging on pink for the day. Instead of going the Dorothy Draper route, and don't get me wrong , I ADORE Ms. Draper, I thought I would reflect on my most favorite use of pink EVER, my magical wedding reception:
approximately 3 inches in diameter.Like a wonton wrapper.
What did I do to deserve the pain you gave me?
It is amazing just how busy Mr Moo has in fact been, Monk Park Farm has now a wonderful colourful counter and even on a chilly day in February chilldren were waiting in great anticipation for their teddy cones topped by a scoop of mr moo's ice cream!
The discotheque was in a big warehouse. The bathrooms were far away. I went. Upon returning, the place had become packed. I bought another Cuba Libre and looked around for the girl. I wanted to find her so that I could give her her stuff and get a cab back to my hostel.
family room that day. I was so touched by how
“Malaysia will not be able to progress if we continue to have people like Ibrahim Ali who professes to champion along racial lines with disregard to the sensitivity of other communities in the country,” he said.
1674 comments
"Listen, Mature Girl can't come," Black Dress Girl cautioned me on the phone.
Everyone could get a charge of out that, saying that was Joe Biden just being Joe Biden. But this one’s different. Telling a voter he’s a “smartass” for requesting lower taxes is something the Republicans can and will use.
Hugged them more
Here's what the box looks like when it's closed. I think it was a box for photos but I got it at a thrift shop and thought it would be fun to do a crazy quilting piece and insert it where the photo would go. I will never get to this as there are other "to do" items in my crazy quilting chest of goodies. Soooooooooo........I thought, let's give it away!
of your otherworldliness. A tangle of thorns bearing
Is wanting to socialise wrong? Of course not, that is absurd. Is simply wanting to connect and be with others wrong? Of course not, but defining who we are by drawing a sense of identity from the way we interact with others isn’t finding the truth of who we are. I’m not saying we shouldn’t love one another, or interact with one another, if we experience loneliness when that stops, then it simply means that we don’t love ourselves enough to just be. Being alone should not affect us adversely. We are all ultimately alone.
I once sent an email to Gasp Jeans’ Prahran store and within a few months it had closed down. Coincidence?
It's just like homecoming. Something I so long waited for, taken.
1 can cream corn
'Smath
The only way you are able to read this now is because you are using some form of a computer, are logged on to the internet, and chances are you had clicked on a link on Facebook or Google to get here (or possibly another search engine). Facebook and Google have changed the way human beings live and have become an integral part of the world's physical and psychosocial infrastructure. They are free services in the sense that we don't have to pay either company a cent to use them, and if you have a handheld device such as an iPhone or another brand of smart phone, you have immediate access to their information.
FILM EDITING
White Wine
I have to remind myself how fortunate I am to live so close to a wonderful spot like this and make time to take advantage of it more often. Of course once the longer days of summer arrive it’ll be a lot easier.
I'd be lying if I said I wasn't totally freaked out.
If there’s one thing that I really enjoy doing, it’s finding ways to cut costs without cutting quality. I try to do this as often as I can, and in as many areas of my life as possible. I don’t always succeed, of course, and there are plenty of times when paying more for something ends up better in the long run. But there are still plenty of areas in which I can simplify and apply a frugal philosophy without cutting an ounce of quality from what I have or how I live.
288 10. “Modern Greece.” Contributions to the article in the Fifteenth Edition of the Encyclopedia Britannica. Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, October 30, 1997, p. 3. (Source: Item C-1974(2), above.) See Item C-2001(6), below, pp. 435-36.
Needless to say, it's an amazing book and deserves a huge amount of success. If you're a fan of Darren Shan (and frankly, who isn't?), Phillip Pullman or just great, dark horror-shows, get this book. BTW, the circus scene will disturb your dreams for a LONG time.
the smell of fresh cut grass
Leaves are a Woodware Punch
Siamo in vacanza.
How many times have I been persuaded that doing the hard work of dying to my own needs and wants isn’t what God requires?
As if it could read his mind, the droid’s head swiveled audibly on its servos and aimed its glowing photoreceptors at him. “Welcome back aboard, Master Rayloth.”
Degenerate
Narrator Good night Bill.
CHE = hey!
“No, I’m going to be Sophie.”
The wicked flee when no man pursueth: but the righteous are bold as a lion.
Hard! I'm telling you, staying at home with an almost 2 year old and a 5 1/2 week old is HARD! I love my girls. Wouldn't change them for anything. But this job is not for the weak. I don't want to forget the details, so this is just a description of our day yesterday. Nothing out of the ordinary.
Competition ends on 4th May 2012.
Unconfirmed twitter activity:
And one side was good. A band from Massachusetts called Grief. I'd heard some slower heavy music before – Melvins, Sabbath, etc. - but Grief took it all and injected some serious psychotic depressing vibes to it. I enjoyed it (if “enjoy” is the right word for something so nihilistic), gave it a few listens and flipped it over. The other band, Suppression, simply fucking destroyed. I'd heard some grindy shit before, had my mind similarly blown by Napalm Death not much earlier, but Suppression was next level. It was a feral blur, sheets of sound draped over blastbeats with harsh noise textures clawing their way through.
That’s what I’ll leave you with. I hope it makes some of you sit up with interest like it does me.
Supposed to be going to Chicago to see him at the end of November … who knows.
For the EU in its assistance and support
Tomorrow I'll flush the brewery through to make sure it's all clean prior to the brewday, so I'll find out then if I need to get my hands dirty and change the pump. I do have a spare unit, just in case, but I'd rather not have the aggro.
I’m taking the advice of a friend and I’m not making resolutions, I’m setting goals. And I’m setting attainable goals so as not to be counterproductive in the long run.
If you could overcome your distaste for the Catholic church and the Holy Father for a minute you would recognize a man who understands this well. Pope Benedict has been quietly (and sometime not so quietly) promoting just this issue. Pope JP was a great man, but the threat of Islam was lost on him. Benedict is not about to give up Europe without a fight.
This really is a must see film for fans of superhero comic books as well as anyone who enjoys big science fiction adventure films. The dialogue is full of humour but nothing goes too over the top.
The Big Picture: A Balanced Diet for Healthy Hair
When we tell people at home or at work that they’re causing you a lot of stress, it’s not a complement and we’re not asking them to lay on some more.
Yet as I read Obama’s interview with Jeff Goldberg in The Atlantic, then his speech to the AIPAC convention, and finally reports of his meeting with Netanyahu, I felt increasingly uneasy. True, Obama went farther than he ever has in reassuring Israel of his commitment to stopping a nuclear Iran. He explicitly mentioned the military option. He upheld Israel’s right to defend itself. He articulated the reasons why a nuclear Iran would be disastrous—from an accelerated nuclear arms race in the Middle East to the threat of a nuclear suitcase in the hands of terrorists. He affirmed, in other words, what we in Israel have been warning about for years.
Important thing I should remember: After playing basketball, don't go shopping in the grocery store next to your office, where you're likely to run into no less than ten people you work with. People who you work with, who may wonder why I'm completely sweaty and why I (I'm sure) smell awful.
200g packet of thick rice stick noodles (200g is more than enough for 4 adult servings)
With the moment I have
Vintage Hearth
A few nice birds have called in over the last few days. Not for the first time, some of them were seen along the approach road. On Thursday Ian Griffiths saw a Turtle Dove on the wires just by the gate, then later that day he was driving back out when a male Golden Oriole flew down the road ahead of him. Yesterday Dougy Wright was watching one of three Dunlin which dropped in on the Plantlife pool when it was dive-bombed by a Short-eared Owl! And today I saw an immature male Marsh Harrier, probably the one which has been around since last November, along with the three Black-tailed Godwits and a Little Egret. The two godwits which were in winter plumage last week are now rapidly gaining their breeding colours.
And it can happen in the other direction as well. There are people that believe they are impervious to bad things happening. They will tell you about how only good things happen to them. Now, I’m a fan of a positive perspective on life but I’m talking about extremes. These people deny risk or deny bad events. They may let emotions around sad or difficult events go unprocessed or they may engage in very risky behaviors because they believe that there really isn’t a risk.
It's all there.
Sight Word String-Ups are actually a kit that is sold on Amazon. It comes with four trays, a bag of letter beads, some pipe cleaners, and a bunch of flashcards. I gave up on using their trays a long time ago, because four trays is not enough for my small groups, so I just use the beads and pipe cleaners. I also use my own flashcards, because that way we only wind up working on the words I consider to be the most important.
(Enter job ref and ‘search’ for details)
Ever get so frustrated you want to shout but can’t because that wouldn’t be socially acceptable? Except you can’t just keep that bottled up inside, it’s not good for your heart, or any other part of your body if your emotions express themselves psycho somatically.
My Thoughts: Love the action and the danger which forces me to turn the page. This book was a quick read because I didn't want to put the book down. I can't wait for more of this series with these smart siblings.
* Hi Lee and welcome to tall tales & short stories. Would you like to tell us a bit about yourself?
Easter crowds in on all the senses, so that even when understanding fails, you can’t miss it. This is human life, the life He took on and raised up: spiritual and bodily. He is risen. Alleluia!
For now I would like to thank Mr. Conte for his comments, and would love to hear from USADA and/or WADA regarding their side of the Conte conversation.
P.S. Places I am thinking of spending a couple of weeks at: Korea, Shanghai, Tokyo (or any big Asian city!) but mainly Korea. When Hallmark says “In every life, there is drama” they must have meant Korean drama!
Us shlepps at home wear jeans or some form of "exercise" pant day in, day out. Day in, day out. Oh, and top those off with some nice functional hoodies. Also, I have forgotten what "hip" shoes are, because I'm always speed-walking to and from school and everywhere else, so as not to let my ass become as gargantuan as it wants to, so I'm mostly in running shoes. Or some sort of clunky black boots to keep my frozen toes from falling off. Winter blowz.
Ah, the weekend passes by too quickly. The darkness comes so early, a sign that winter is approaching. Yuck!
So it has been a long time since I put any of my newest crafting adventures (like last I blogged was before Christmas). I have been doing only a little bit of crafting, mostly cat wrangling- my cat Wendy has been causing major havoc all over the house- jumping in Christmas trees, destroying plastic wrappers...but how can you be mad at this face?
Basically she was telling me that although Rhiannon had just tested positive for a severe allergy to two different dust mites, this had no effect on her health. It was illogical for me to think that her immune system that was dealing with an allergy to dust mites would be further weakened and more vulnerable to colds and flus. These symptoms were rather a result of not being immunized. Just in case you agree with her, please check out this recent German study using more than 17, 000 children. Or check out this less formal compilation which actually finds that non-vaccinated kids are sick LESS often. You will notice that according to this study (which has its weaknesses: relying on self-reported data, very small sample size for non-vaccinated children [.7% of the population], etc.) there was no statistically significant difference between rates of colds and flus between immunized and non-immunized children.
God Bless India and its People. Amin.
I would create countless new regulations and seldom cancel old ones. They would be so complicated that only bureaucrats, lawyers and lobbyists could understand them. That way small businesses with big ideas wouldn’t stand a chance – and I would never have to worry about another Thomas Edison, Henry Ford or Steve Jobs.
Five years ago the victims of official government repression could be counted on the fingers of one hand. As of November 2011, however, there are too many examples to enumerate. Below is just a small sample from across the Western world of people who have been legally harassed, prosecuted, or threatened with prosecution:
So, here I am in the first full day of the literary festival. It's a pretty quiet one for me, most of the events I'm going to are happening tomorrow. I attended the sponsor's reception yesterday evening, which was a new experience for me. One of the first people I met was Annie Barrows, co-author of the massively best-selling The Guernsey Literary & Potato Peel Pie Society, and the top celebrity author here at the festival. She was very friendly and down to earth, and we talked about the strange leap of faith it takes to start calling yourself "a writer". It good to know that even hugely successful authors struggle with that one from time to time.
Julia has kindly invited me to visit Baby Alexi so I can see just how gorgeous she is. Julia hasn’t mentioned in her testimonial that Alexi was born ‘in the caul’ i.e. in the amniotic sac. This is considered to be very lucky. It is also a sign that Julia was very relaxed and that her midwife allowed the birth to play out naturally.
Silverstone
"The city councilman?"
In typical form, the government is sticking it to the people. Buying Italian bonds has become an issue of patriotism with strong calls and intense public pressure for citizens to plunk down their hard earned savings and bail out the government. They even have footballers and celebrities endorsing government bonds.
*Oskar met another pug and insisted on sitting right next to him and confusing his owner. That’s my pug!
Event Carmen Recital
I speak of mountains, forests and the pond
DISC 1.
I keep that picture above on my fridge to remind me where I've been.
With a medium cookie scoop, scoop dough onto prepared baking sheet about 1 inch apart. With your thumb, press into each cookie making a little well for the Biscoff. Using a small cookie scoop, scoop about 1 tablespoon Biscoff into each pressed cookie. Place another scoop of cookie dough on top and press edges gently. Biscoff will not be completly enclosed and will be visible around edges. Bake for 12-15 minutes, until edges are just golden brown. Let cool for 10 minutes on baking sheet then transfer to a cooling rack to cool completely.
(Drumroll please!)
the sun' said our first minister on the right to a free university education.
A depiction of an arrested person holding a large quantity of U.S. currency. Photo: Shutterstock.com, all rights reserved.
This year, they hope for more.
6) They only allow 6 articles of clothing at a time in the fitting room, so the associate working the fitting room will place the rest of your selections on a rack. Make sure to keep an eye on the rack and switch out your "no's" as you go. (One heartbreaking year, the store associates had taken my additional items that I wanted to try on and accidentally started to redisplay them in the store... and we all know how long it takes to go through the big, busting-at-the-seams store).
Victoria (Tory) Frail
It's in two words... one of them being in French
I remember at my first Hypnobirthing class, 15wks pregnant, and my instructor asked every couple to share what they hoped to gain from taking her class. I said, “Well, I really don't want a c-section, and I really want my birth to be a satisfying experience.”
Take a look at my body
Don't forget to make sure to enter in our latest challenge over at the Some Odd Girl Challenge Blog! The challenge currently is Bright and Blinding Colors! And some of these new stamps would be perfect for this challenge!!!! So make sure to grab your set of these new stamps!
Meanwhile, enjoy this photo of the 2011 Weizen Bock, compared with the previous model:
Now, let's go check and see what the other Dueling Darlings created...
Fun Quotes:
Olein and her group located a second Mantis underwater base in the Gulf of California. This was a smaller base used for human experiments, torture, hybridization clones, and a feeding area for elite Dracos. 300 men, women, and children missing from southern Mexico states (presumed to have been killed by drug cartels) were found, many with their brains removed and functioning on brain stem or mechanical implants of Draco/Mantis design. These people were removed before the destruction and it is uncertain what t do with them; some had their souls removed and the souls were placed in stasis chambers, but those souls were freed and are under going healing in the 7th Density by Arcturians.
People say where did God come from; well listen (READ) carefully this statement; it’s a clever play on words and reality actually:
And Finally, work will be taking me to some far and away places in the upcoming months. while searching for breweries in North Jersey (I have to spend some time there at the end of May), I stumbled across this video on the Cricket Hill Brewery website, makers of the best beer in the world, or so says Brew Master Rick Reed. After watching, I seriously considered staying an extra night just to see this guy in action.
Remember to post your projects using Inlinkz no later than 12:00 noon Central time on Friday, October 28, 2011. We will announce the winner of the stamp set and the new Top Mouse Award winners when the new sketch challenge is posted on Saturday, October 29th. Please use a direct link to your project and feel free to enter as many times as you like!
I don't do hypothetical questions or I would hypothetically hire a wonderful nanny to help me out or I'd come up with a hypothetical cure for his ailment. It's always hard trying to evenly spread your time so that all your children feel loved and cared for. I think we all struggle with that. We can only do our best though.
5) a variety of warm shawls for wrapping around the neck
Special features not available. (Warner Bros. Home Entertainment)
So, they go searching for the cockup and they also wrap my ankle and put it in an aircast. They decide I also need crutches and to keep my weight off my ankle BUT WAIT - since my wrist is sprained too I can only use ONE crutch and will have to just do the best I can to get around and keep my weight off my leg.
When Dad was sentenced to prison and the family was standing in the courthouse hallway, I overheard my aunt and another woman talking about my aunt being pregnant. As soon as the other woman walked away, I asked my aunt if she was going to have a baby (she was already showing, but I hadn’t noticed). My aunt looked as if she was going to cry and told me that she had wanted to tell me as soon as she knew but Mama forbade it. I guess Mama thought I would figure it out when the baby was born! I was thrilled! I couldn’t wait for the baby to come. He was born in December 1957 and his mother generously allowed me to be a part of his life. And I loved that little boy with all my heart! I held him as soon as he came home from the hospital and was changing his diapers by the time he was a month old. That child became my heart and I’ll always be grateful to my aunt for sharing him with me.
Colorful fish glow in the submarine’s LED headlights. A nurse shark whooshes past below the passengers’ feet — a surreal experience, since the acrylic wall of the cockpit, around 16 centimeters (6 inches) thick, becomes invisible under water. “Pretty amazing, right?” asks Engen, good-humored and tan.
The $90,000 winner’s share of the Iroquois purse raised Arcadius’ career earnings past $300,000.
"A high-stakes, high-octane tour through a devastating and deftly imagined future. This is Mancusi at the top of her game." --Diana Peterfreund, author of For Darkness Shows the Stars
The particular tough part in relation to mobile phone figures is they can be primarily unpublished. That is why a person will not locate any information about the subject making use of the actual aged approaches. Old techniques can be utilizing the actual search engines similar to Google, proceeding to the cellular phone firms intended for guidance, or even seeking the actual help from the police force or maybe investigators.
A child will be born for us. A son will be given to us. The government will rest on his shoulders. He will be named: Wonderful Counselor, Mighty God, Everlasting Father, Prince of Peace. His government and peace will have unlimited growth. He will establish David’s throne and kingdom. He will uphold it with justice and righteousness now and forever. The LORD of Armies is determined to do this! Isaiah 9:6-7
Simply Potatoes has teamed up with Food.com to use the Ready, Set, Cook! (RSC) contest format to promote recipe creations using their brand of refrigerated potato products.
So here they are with absolutely no order or sense:
From December to today- Marissa is overcoming obstacles that her doctors do NOT believe with their own eyes, and the magnitude of this miracle with only GROW. Like a snowball rolling down a hill, this will take a mighty effect and the momentum to get this ball rolling will be the Prayers, agreements, and Belief from all who know Marissa.
I guess to really appreciate my point of view, suppose I'd been asked the question and replied that I wanted a bit more lavacultophilia (not that I actually do). My wife would be in a similar quandry (except that lavacultophilia is a real word which actually means a desire to stare at someone in a bathing suit). I got this randomly out of the Grandiloquent Dictionary. In my case, looking up appreciation doesn't necessarily give me anything I can use.
I really wouldn’t mind doing all of this work I do everyday, if just once my family members would say, “Thank you.” Perhaps a thank you when I drag myself out of bed to drive my youngest to school, when she misses the bus, would be nice. Perhaps a thank you from my husband for picking up his laundry at the dry cleaners every week.
So, instead: My Top 5 Recommended Books from My Childhood
What is this urge to render dark
And why do I write with some anguish today . . . because somethings in my day-to-day life happened (insignificant really) which made me feel unworthy again. I was pushed back, blocked, scammed, condescended upon . . . again all really pretty insignificant happenings that occur in our daily lives. But for me (adoptees in general I dare say), it only takes a few happenings like these, and our rejection wound is scratched. Really, after a while, it gets embarrassing and exhausting. I know that I have been “pushed back” to my hurt today. And, I seem to not be able to get past it until I express it.
Large Prawns, 7 pcs
Such a long time ago
In January we became Facebook friends, and he started messaging me on the weekends. Our messages started out friendly, but they soon became flirtier and flirtier. When he would stop by my room for coffee, he would hang out for a few minutes while waiting for it to “finish” brewing, even when it was done. Every time he stopped by a curious thing happened: I was suddenly very horny.
As much as I love eating ice cream in a bowl, I love it way more in nutty chocolate-covered bar-on-a-stick form. These bars are pure magic, folks. Pure magic.
Several students from DeForest Area High School qualified for state competition, which was held on Saturday, April 28 at Whitewater High School.
‘LIBERTY of thought, expression, belief, faith and worship.’
And last but not least, my newest furry baby needed a little something. I sewed up a simple rectangle of fleece, stuffed it with batting and catnip, and added a ribbon (because Ninja loves ribbons). I think he likes it!
Cesare sadly makes his way through the halls of…somewhere, it’s not clear where, and comes across Juan trying on some new armour and talking about how he wants to dress it up with a big yellow Borgia bull on the breastplate. Subtle.
2. It’s National Poetry Month & lots of great readings!
We've sorrow enough in the natural way,
It was pretty late by the time I dropped Jen off, but not too late to exercise. I’ve done three great weightlifting-based workouts in a row, so it was time for some cardio. Due to the late hour, I thought a run would be best. I threw on some workout clothes before dropping Jen off, and went for a run in her neighborhood, for a change of pace. She lives close to Toluca Lake, a very affluent and fancy part of town that’s been home, at some point or another, to all sorts of famous people: Bob Hope, Frank Sinatra, and Amelia Earhart all called it home, as have Miley Cyrus (and her family), the Jonas Brothers, Jason Priestley, Steve Carell and Eric McCormack. It’s a beautiful part of town to run in, because of the lovely (and large) houses. Here’s my route:
Thailand is one of the top vacation spots for this. But there's also the north alabama vacation spots of having your very own liking. I particularly enjoying sitting back around the north alabama vacation spots a villa on your own kitchen. You never have to worry about proximity to theme parks and a downstairs wetroom style shower. There is just enough space to yourself also makes it possible to spend your upcoming Rhodes holidays 2010 with your family, friends or family members. And having a large number of Disney condos offer all of them, the first 5 Gigabyte.
I can be overwhelmed by too many choices. Give me two options and I’m a lot happier. Chocolate or vanilla? With or without nuts? When I walk in a store like Charming Charlie’s that is full of every accessory and organized by color, I’m likely to come out empty-handed because I could decide. Too much. Sensory overload!
1) Finish Virtual Worlds Chapter
Really don’t think people realise just how much of a struggle being a single parent can be. Or how much of a struggle just being a family is these days.
Preheat oven to 350F. Mix the dry ingredients together first, then add your fruit. In a separate bowl, mix the wet ingredients. Combine well and then pour slowly over your dry ingredients. The batter will be thick, almost cookie dough consistency. Grease your muffin tin (I used coconut oil) and spoon in the batter (I used a tin that makes 12 muffins). It took exactly 20 minutes for mine to bake, but for larger muffins you might want to bake for 30-40 minutes. Let them cool completely before you try to remove from the muffin tin.
These pieces are all available for sale. Six of them are on the shelves of my Etsy shop already and the rest of the pieces will be added in the coming days. Please stop by my shop to browse, to see close-up, detailed images of each piece, and to read more about the series.
Why do you binge eat? He asked.
I'm assuming most parents wouldn't brag about these things. Why not? Because it's pretty obvious why we might be better at these things than our children. We are bigger, stronger, more experienced with words and strategies and making money. The decks are stacked in our favor. Our kids have no chance against us in these and many other competitions.
27. Wonders if any of my friends has and iPad???? I want one really bad...they are really KEWL!
(from the original post, 23 Sept 2009): Spending years perfecting their musical (and vocal!) chops in countless bars in Toronto and beyond, this is the group that, three short years later, became The Band. During that three years, these guys were some of the most controversial musicians around, backing Bob Dylan on his first worldwide electric tours. Creating some of the most alive, raw and soulful music ever heard, they were booed almost everywhere for the heresy of perverting pure folie Dylan. Little did they know Bob always wanted to be a rock star and the incredible musicianship of the Hawks helped him achieve what he always wanted!
And speaking of yogurt, I was fairly upset when they switched from putting lids on the containers to the foil non-replaceable tops. Not cool yogurt companies, some of us like to use less than one cup at a time or to reuse our containers.
"I’m running out of people who disagree with me anymore," the pot entrepreneur quipped, as we sipped pop together inside the visitors’ area of the massive, razor-wire-clad jail northwest of the Mississippi state capital of Jackson.
Below the Name section, you will see others like “Class,” “Initial Level,” “EXP Curve,” “Character Graphic,” and “Face Graphic.”
Gemma: Hi Dan, I can’t decide what underwear to put on today, can you help?
(To Coffee Bean: I'm sorry if I put you through the responsibility of single-handedly taking care of the blog posts. That was quite rude of me and I'll try to refrain from doing so again.)
3) I don't want someone who feels it was a great idea to post gun sight images on her web site(s) over congressional districts, or opposing politicians. Whether this was a factor in the tragedy in Arizona or not. Someone who aspires to be president shouldn't be this stupid and not know that this could possibly incite violence and unwanted actions. It was a childish maneuver period.
The study is made available through the Manufacturing Alliance on Patent Policy, and may be accessed here (link)
Certain chapters, as on compassion in sexual relationships, zipped by too rapidly. But on accepting a degree of using materialism and dealing with money, as with Trungpa, so with Rinzler: his enthusiasm carries many pages with zest; he pushes a vision, as did his guide Trungpa, that will better the world as well as the individual. Meditations on lovingkindness, death, and basic goodness will be familiar to readers of Trungpa and followers, but they may be fresh and new for those who open "The Buddha Walks into a Bar" who may not have encountered Trungpa or Shambhala concepts before.
My soft-as-shite husband took them in, when they were small, and he has resisted every concerted effort of mine to get rid of them. I felt bad for them at first, as their mother was a whore, and deposited them willy-nilly in the bushes in our front yard. She didn't like the little monsters next door (children of 2 generations worth of tweakers) coming over, dragging them out of the shrubs, and swinging them around, so she wisely decided that our dog was less of a threat, and moved them to our backyard. She then immediately went out and got herself hit by a car. We were left with kittens that were not exactly weaned, and definitely had issues. Plus, they're incredibly inbred, as they couple indiscriminately with the limited gene pool in the neighborhood. Hmmm, that sounds like the blogs I read, too.
4. Realize that not every shot will be perfect. The show is going to last for 20-30 minutes. That’s plenty of time to experiment, and get a feel for how your camera is capturing the images. One year, I had over 200 exposures. Out of all those, about 10 were print-worthy. Back in the days of film, that’d be downright painful. But in the digital age, it costs me nothing but a few extra minutes in Aperture. So just keep shooting.
Anyway, it occurred to me to share what had been going on with us and why God laid us on Great Biscuit's mind.
- 250 grams all-purpose flour
9:00-10:30 Panel 7: Eric Sasono, Alicia Izharuddin, Arnika Fuhrmann
Think about the last time the government got involved in the function of business and the end result was actually better than it was before!
697. Steamed Greens with Asiago Black Peppercorn Popcorn Seasoning, Hunter’s Bologna, Fat Cat, & Arugula Salad @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 12:22 p.m.
metaphors are
1 mattress encasement
Last week, a consulting company sent me their blog column examining what employers should do about workplace bullying (link here). In it, they urge companies to require workers to report bullying activities and imply that discipline would be appropriate for those who do not:
“For drivin’ on a suspended license. Just like I’m doin’ now.” Blackie chuckles. “I’m finally leavin’ this shit town. Leavin’ this whole shit state! I’m on my way to Califor-ni-a.”
Now that we know we will still be Crusaders, I hope to blog more. One of the reasons I haven't been blogging much since the end of December is because I have been consumed by Brett's job decision. I've learned so much during this process that I want to share with you all...without overwhelming you with information, so I'll be sharing my struggles and joys in the weeks to come.
I went in, found the owner and asked him why he wanted me to come.”Why not?,” he answered.
09. General Levy - The Wig
*I absolutely was not compensated for this post. Not even one hot wing. We just really enjoy this restaurant, it's a part of our history and it was fun to share it with our kiddos. If you ever drive by one, turn around at the next exit. Seriously, those wings are worth the extra hour!
(b) Promote growth and sustainability ; establish appropriate politics and
Things are getting annoying, but I'm determined to keep the court date and really fight for this money. I did find a new job (not as a nanny, for the first time in almost a decade) and am very happy with my life, but this one thing is really bothering me because I was flat out taken advantage of and treated like garbage. I'm hoping she shows up for court and I can look her in the eye as the judge reads her texts aloud, the ones where she acknowledges how much she owes me. I'm livid with the situation, but I've got a good feeling about mid-December. Nannies need to stand up for themselves and I'm doing my part in that.
I can hear the music in my head now.
Earlier in the year I started ‘mums.sew.inspired', creative workshops for ‘inspired mums’. Since becoming a mum, I found it so refreshing to have a night out to do something creative, just for me. I love teaching these classes and sharing my passion and skills with other mums. It is so rewarding teaching others to hand make something for their children or home. A few ladies who have never sewed before have been inspired to go off on their own creative endeavors – I think I love this most!
Here’s what you are paying for:
Yes, I'm in love with my Nikibiki tank... and if anyone wants to buy me a few more, feel free!! Of course - get yourself one while you're at it!
People run to the good and copy but never look at the ones that failed to copy - opportunity to fix the failure and turn it into a success. I still think it goes to wanting instant success and that drives people to jump without thinking it through.
The recent Jewish New Year will always be remembered as the day when the false idol of capitalism disintegrated, and its fragments were strewn about the entire universe. Even the waters of many rivers could not wash away the clouds of dust that resulted from the collapse of the modern Tower of Babel. Wall Street's walls fell in minutes, signalling the end of capitalism, just like the fall of the Berlin Wall symbolized the end of communism.
First you need to grind the wheat very coarsely. My electric wheat grinder can't do coarse enough. My hand grinder can but it's too big of a pain to drag out so I use this handy little coffee grinder. (You can also use a blender with the pulse setting.)
I've always loved bone marrow - is that not the sole reason to eat osso bucco so you can score the marrow prize? Roasted bone marrow has always been on the menu at the famed St John by Fergus Henderson but Pig Flyin' assures me you don't have to travel to London to savour this dish.
SUPER easy!
Sunnies: H&M
City Pages’ Dara Moskowitz Grumdahl reviews Big Daddy’s: The Giants of Outdoor Cooking (The parking lot on the northeast corner of University and Dale, 609 University Avenue West, St. Paul, Saturdays, about 11:00 a.m. to 7:00 p.m., or until the food runs out, 651.276.3101) and Miel Y Leche Cupcats at Letterbox (2741 Hennepin Ave. S., Minneapolis; Saturdays, noon to 6:00 p.m., or until the food runs out, 651.246.2524, www.myspace.com/mielylechecatering). citypages.com … Busy bloggers MSPFoodies.com review Capital Grille (801 Hennepin Ave, Minneapolis, 612-692-9000, www.thecapitalgrille.com), La Bodega Tapas Bar (3005 Lyndale Ave S, Minneapolis, 612-823-2661), Al Vento (5001 34th Ave S Minneapolis, 866-383-3107, www.alventorestaurant.com), Muffuletta (2260 Como Ave, St. Paul, 651-644-9116, www.muffuletta.com), Kabobs (7814 Portland Ave S, Bloomington, 612-636-7786, www.thekabobs.com) and Chapati (7078 Amundson Ave, Edina, 952-946-0009, www.chapati.us). … MSPFoodies.com reviews Corner Table (4257 Nicollet Ave, Minneapolis, 612-823-0011, www.cornertablerestaurant.com), and Falafel King (8405 Lyndale Ave S, Bloomington, 952-888-3008, also has locations in Uptown and Downtown Minneapolis, www.falafelking.com).
A 3-hour historic walking tour of Bushwick is being offered on Saturdays May 5 and May 12 by John Dereszewski, who was district manager of Bushwick's community board during the 1970s.
“What d'you mean 'kinda??? Did he or didn't he?”
He ranted against banks, mining houses and white-owned land and said: “the media mustn't tell me I own land. I own a little bit of land”. He praised ex-ANC president Nelson Mandela for “his visionary leadership which convinced the ANC to drop its peaceful resistance and start the armed struggle”.
A full accounting of the censorship battle faced by the comic book industry is a topic worthy of a full
How does this pertain to writing? Short comings. We all have them. For some of us it is that we are just starting out and could learn more . It could be that we struggle with tag lines, settings, POV, grammar, the list goes on. My point? Don't give up. Work, work harder then you have ever worked before.
I'm glad we did it; and afterwards, I was even happier to sit down far away from the maddening crowds, eat my spicy Italian salami panini and drink a cold beer in a quiet piazza. (Can you tell that I'm on another pork-eating binge?)
The insidious and highly dishonest assertion that the Counterjihad community is partially to blame for this attack is without any merit whatsoever. Most importantly, it’s a completely irrational claim. The anti-Islamic movement embraces traditional Western libertarian values which are part and parcel of its philosophy, values which Breivik through his evil deeds and his twisted manifesto has shown that he wholeheartedly abhors. The violence and utter rejection of basic democratic principles displayed by radical Muslims is the entire reason why a Counterjihad movement exists. If Islam had been a democratic religion, there would be no Counterjihad movement.
My initial thought was that it seemed kind of cheesy. And dare I say, amateurish? That seems harsh coming from someone who has absolutely no skill in writing. Grammar Goddess I am not. You could get your big, red marker out and go crazy on just about any post I've ever published here. There is much I could probably learn from many of you ... not only about good writing, but what makes a good reader too.
So the mechanics;
Okay, on to the major lessons learned yesterday.
Wisdom of the system
One thing that is interesting about Sharpley is that he was once Jimmy Clausen's back-up at Notre Dame and even started a few games for the Fighting Irish.
Jackman's was another beer that Thad picked up a couple of weeks ago. I preferred it to the Southern Tier Harvest Ale.
That’s what the four-legged part of Team Reid is! We did some work this past weekend and oh my! I could tell that it was either a combo of the weather and bad attitude or that combo mixed in with them being out of shape. They both conked out before their 30 minute training sessions were up! Maybe 30 minutes was a bit too long.
The wedding will take place in the Spring or Summer of 2011, in London. Further details about the wedding day will be announced in due course.
I respect everybody’s view and you’ll all have your own, just sharing mine here, my very personal philosophical interpretation,.
He served in the Army Air Force, but he was not a pilot. His main job was to sail out and recover airmen - or what was left of them - after their planes were shot down over the Pacific.
Pick One Drink: A good glass of red wine or water.
And one does have to wonder what the Cardinal would make of this union?
All in all, it was an eye opener. Even the teachers, who had university educations, lived in small basic huts which they rented for 20,000 shillings. Considering their monthly wage is 30,000 shillings, it leaves very little income left for food or clothes. Essentially they are living on 3 euros a month (or 10,000 uganda shilling).
4. thread
Heavy-pack guy introduces himself as “Musher.”
I found myself really wanting to finish In Bed with a Highlander to see how Mairin and Ewan’s story ended. Maya Banks starts off the series well and readers will want to read the rest of the series.
1. Think about the fact that we cannot do it and God alone does.
Finally, I have a constructive work triangle, which doesnt make me just want to scream in rage everytime I cook or bake something. As you guys know, I am supposed to be on hiatus, studying for my examinations and all that jazz. However, since the exams will be over by next week, I decided to test out my new oven! I could be compared to a child, yearning for a kaleidoscopic lolly, hung right in front of her face, but just far enough for her to not be able to grab it and lick away. My father told me last night, "Do NOT make anything till the exams are over!!".....But hey, he's at work, and he'd never know, right?
— The action happens in a third of the game map. When both M-Com stations are destroyed, another third of the map becomes active and two new M-Com stations are online. In total you’ll be fighting for 3 pairs of M-Com stations.
This is a 9X9 layout and I have to admit that I had fallen deep in love with the Glitz Design paper pads. I still remember I first bought their paper layers last year and thought I liked the thin vintage papers. I tried to search for it last night but could not find and gave up. I knew I have not used it though :)
"I woke up and heard a strange scratching sound. I turned on the light and saw this monster working its way along the wall using his claw," said Mrs Duan of Suining, southwest China.
We’ll wait.
Give me fresh corn and wheat, give me serene-moving animals teaching
On New Year's Day, I wanted to walk there.
Gallery 1
You want to throw with stones,
Today marks the exact 3-week countdown until I return chez moi – or, at least, to somewhere in the U.S. I don’t really have any summer plans at all yet. I’m laboring under the delusion that if I delay for long enough making plans for my summer, plans will magically materialize and I’ll have something awesome to do with my life for the next three months. Any suggestions? Here’s what I’m kicking around:
like it’s even worth celebrating. all everyone can talk about when anyone mentions ‘Malaysia’ is the current comical state of our country’s politics and the petrol hike and Anwar.
7. First Korean Pop Concert/Showcase
Next time I’m bringing a xanax.
At the end of the tour, the conversation went like this:
"It's snowing," Papa Grey-Frosty bellowed. Actually, this was before the big snow, wasn't it? The noveltly was fresh. Helen hadn't seen real snow in almost a year. Mason wouldn't know snow if he was caught in an avalanche. I braved a look, and regretted it. The rug, the floor, the children were covered in styrofoam peanuts. The things generated static electricity and clung to every surface, crawling up the legs of Grey's jeans like snowy gangrene. Helen and Mason were rolling in a field of white. Helen made a peanut angel then ran to the kitchen, tufted in peanut puffs.
What if this story is true and they can bamboozle your brain without you even realizing it, but at the same time, completely realizing it.
7. Around Us – 5:18
Now, let’s distill Colossians and Hebrews and add it to Paul:
C’mon, Lovin’ Spoonful, what’s a little sweat between friends? Didn’t you know that when the fabulous leave for the traffic-jammed Hamptons New York becomes a playground for the rest of us?
The second woman steps accidentally on a duck
Challenge # 115
I think it's because of this amount of effort and the fact that Black hair is always ready to break or drop out at a moment's notice, that prompts Black women to talk about hair styles and hair care every time they meet.
Oh dear God!
Here is the Publishers Marketplace listing:
Topbox is a Canadian company that delivers 4 hand-picked deluxe beauty samples to your door each month for just $10.
In keeping with my newly announced "51 percent rule," I decided that the only way to determine if Scipio was right in his determination that Flash's "sci-fi elements" weren't "the core of his world" would be to demonstrate this statistically. So I used the first issue of SHOWCASE PRESENTS: THE FLASH as a starting-point. I made two columns: one for all Flash-adventures in which the hero faced any sort of "sci-fi" menace, ranging from aliens, cloud-monsters and talking gorillas (Grodd knows why), while the other column only included relatively mundane adventures, whether it was the hero fighting car thieves or costumed super-villains who only used science-fiction as a quick gimmick, rather than borrowing from the tropes of science-fiction in other media.
“Thank you, Your Highness,” I replied. “I’m glad you enjoyed the show.”
Now I realize that pretending to be confident runs contrary to being natural. But we’ll make an exception in this case .I think the more you practice being confident and assertive the more natural it becomes to you. Try to relax. Don’t let unnecessary pressure or expectations on this interaction, just go with it okay. I have a theory, just came up with it. When you approach a woman and you’re obviously terrified, I think it switches on in her whatever sort of maternal nurturing instinct she has and instead of being attracted to you as a potential mate, she just wants to take care of you like a trembling baby bird that just smashed on the concrete after falling from its mom’s nest.
A good afternoon.
Deb and I walked on the sand. I was barefooted and loving every minute of it. I even went into the cold water just a little way. Then I beach combed in the water where the tide was coming in to gather Sand Dollars for Deb. Others had already cleared the dry beach sand of them. She found a couple of pretty pieces of wood too, to take home to Minnesota with her. I so wish I could do that every day because it is one of the best possible exercises, and one I would do.
Moving from table to table, the Roving Wizard serves a 5-10 minute program right on the table top of your guests. The Table side Conjurer creates his show out of the barest essentials–miniature props he carries around in the pockets of his tuxedo and humorous stories to go along with them.
New from Tor Books: Immobility by Brian Evenson.
over-the-top, frilly and overwraught. Bush's bursting, exultant
Hara I. Health status and PCBs in blood of workers exposed to PCBs and of their children. Environ Health Persp 1985; 59 85-90.
Behind her, Notia said, "What happened? Where'd the Gateway go?" Her tone made it an accusation.
He then has some choice commentary on the topic.
And free mimosas for the mommies, lol!
March 05 Red Devil Lounge, San Francisco CA
This has been a godsend for me during these winter months. I have never been a heavy cream user, but my skin has been feeling extra parched lately. I don't use this all over my face, rather, I concentrate most of my application on my cheek area. Although it feels thick, my skin drinks it up and doesn't leave it feeling greasy at all.
Now…The new 2012 PointsPlus plan! I go to my meetings on Friday’s- so the full scoop on this plan will be discussed this coming Friday. Since they gave all of the updated info already online, I was able to read about it last Friday. My leader did tell us a little bit since she knew most of us would be needing some sort of explanation as to why we were shorted daily points. lol
I know for me, the pain, the constant feeling bad (like I have the flu), the constant medications, doctors, poking and probing make me want to give up. It just gets monotonous. What makes me tick? Good question. I can’t stand being lied to. I believe you should treat others the way you would have others treat you. Don’t judge a book by its cover because you never know what that person is going through. Try to be respectful of others. Screw me once, shame on you. Screw me twice, shame on me. I do tend to hold grudges longer than I should. I get that from my Cherokee Indian grandmother. I love photography! It is my joy in life. I love doing portraits of people and watching their faces light up when they see the prints. There is a satisfaction in knowing I did that like no other. I brought joy to someone else’s life in some small way. And last but definitely not least, it’s my boys. I live for them. They make me tick, drive me. To be a better mom, a better woman, a better person. I live to watch Jared play football. He is an amazing wide receiver and defensive back. I love watching him pounce like a cat on whoever has the ball in hand at the time. I love watching Camron play tennis. Although that sport bores me to tears, I couldn’t be prouder!
This energetic, entertaining event pits the world-famous Harlem Ambassadors against local celebrity players in a hilarious game that will thrill the entire family. All proceeds benefit The Salvation Army Boys & Girls Club.
And I am so amazed that she knew the right number to say next. She wasn't repeating what I had just said- she already knew which number came next!
Oh look, here's Justin North. He says hello to us all before he starts sharpening his knives -- in a non-threatening way, of course. I've met Justin several times before, but it's still an altogether different experience seeing him in his element.
In the original recipe, it's all colorful because it calls for 4 different flavors of Jello. But, for Independence Day, I use 2 boxes of Berry Blue and 2 boxes of Strawberry. Here is my version of the recipe, but you can make it as colorful as you want by using whatever flavors float your boat (she uses lime, lemon, orange, and cherry and I highly recommend those flavors!)
On Phantasy, Clark gives Roe's crystal clear sugary melodies more room to breathe, unlike on Winter's Day, where they were often buried underneath Boettcher's relentless percussion and intense multi-layered and intricate harmony vocals. Most of the material here is written by Roe, the exception being the two extraordinarily sweet and bouncy bubblegum numbers "Goodbye Yesterday" and "These Are The Children", which were written by the aforementioned Sandy Salisbury. Roe's songs range from the sun-kissed and introspective on "Visions", to the flower-poppy and beatles-esque on songs like the leadoff track "Paisley Dreams" which comes complete with a full orchestral treatment, sitar runs and spacey harmonies. "Plastic World", a statement on the "phoniness" of modern society, strikes a perfect balance between the power-bubblegum Roe was soon to be known for and the arty experimentation that was in vogue at the time, showcasing found sounds and dramatic tempo changes between verse and chorus. Roe also delivers some material reminiscent of his early teeny-bopper rock 'n' roll with songs like "Little Miss Sunshine" and "Mystic Magic", albeit with a dash more of sugar and perhaps a bit of marijuana smoke thrown in for good measure. "The You I Need" may be the highlight of the record though, as Roe delivers one his most earnest vocals ever along with one of the most sublime melodies he ever penned on this uptempo baroque-bubblegum charmer.
I topped My Boyfriend Scales Walls with the Shatter in this collection, Shatter the Scales. It's a dark green with silver shimmer. When I applied it, I didn't go past the edge of the white at the base of my nails, and as the crackle dried, it pulled in from the edge quite noticeably. I didn't like that white border, so I touched up with more crackle at the base, which is why I've got cracks running in several directions. I added topcoat over the crackle.
When we only allow the brain to dominate this results in our actions, behaviour and responses being influenced by our mind/brain preconceptions, our emotions and our ego. When our heart closes life is experienced more superficially.
In one of those insane acts that define modern war, NATO airplanes in 1999 (Operation Noble Anvil) bombed Belgrade and a random bomb destroyed part of the Belgrade Zoo. Prince, a Siberian tiger became so traumatized that he started eating his own legs and had to be euthanized. The tiger became a metaphor for the disintegrating Balkan states.
I love a project that no matter what you do you cant go wrong :) So enough babbling here it is:
Q2.) Have you ever visited an ethnic food store? I’ve only been to a few, but I liked going to them Saturday.
So most of all just take care of yourself...
There are roughly 183 people competing in the $50k Contest and about 40 competing in the Barbiezz,
Maybe I'm a fool but I'm still falling
42. Seen Old Faithful geyser erupt
...A whole stack of doll's-house sized glaze batches today. Now the last time I tried mixing one of these 1Kg, 2.2lb bags of glaze powder, it drove me mad, trying to get a smooth mix, push it through an eighty-mesh sieve, clean multiple containers, I even resorted to pestle and mortar to scrunch the lumpy bits...
In the good old days, folks lived with their parents or possibly by themselves before marriage. These days co-habitation before marriage is almost a pre-requisite. So instead of two dwellings belonging to two families, we might now need three dwellings for the two families and the co-habiting couple. I have not seen statistics on the number of households inIrelandcomprising co-habiting couples but if one third of all babies are born outside marriage, it is likely to be significant.
You'll be transported to yet another fun beach scene
You will find, if you look closer into it, that most muslim women who are punished for "adultery", are in fact rape victims.
for now, she's on steriods to combat the platelet drop.
I read a great article today over at the Prevail Training blog about Knife Fighting versus Knife Defense. I have capitalized those words because in the article a very good point about how this is treated in martial arts circles is made.
I want to wish all of you a blessed remainder of Advent, a Merry Christmas, and a Happy New Year.
Article 60
Foster Wheeler AG, Alternative Energy, Deals By Sector, 2006 to YTD 2012 9
she perches on my shoulder
Shall we try?
I've been busy shooting all kinds of things (product, art, interiors, models) and also branching out doing life drawing/painting sessions with friends, and trying my hand at some collage work. I don't think of myself as any kind of a painter, but once in awhile it is just what the doctor ordered to slow down and mix it up. I haven't let too much of it leak out here because I feel I am on the verge of another phase and I'm not quite sure where it's going yet. (Not to mention life has been BUSY... and fun! Wow!)
Time goes by and no one can tame.
From the time my uncle hid Grandma's dinner buns under the bed, the wondrous sights and sounds of a country fair, and the midnight cow chases through corn fields, with grandpa's old pick up headlights shining the way.
grilled peas
and we will fight against all those
Ten days later I started work with a British based insurance company.
TEMPORAL LOBES – HEARING. More sensory information, especially hearing, is processed in the temporal lobes, which help you make sense of spoken language and music. These lobes also are linked to memory, and damage here can make it hard to understand speech, categorize objects or recall things you’ve seen or been told.
Verizon Wireless announced yesterday that it would look to sell off a substantial chunk of its 700 MHz spectrum holdings if, and only if, the Federal Communications Commission approves a number of pending transactions involving the acquisition of 1.7/2.1 GHz spectrum.
Shock in Athens: People Find Food in Garbage Bins
Tamboran’s documentation says the amount of gas that each well will return will be 1.9 bcf ( Billion Cubic Feet). EUR = Estimated Ultimate Return, or how much a well will produce in its lifetime. They also say that the Fayetteville shale is the most geologically comparable resource to the Bundoran Shale.
I don't think I showed you this mini bunting that I made to go with the picture from a couple of posts ago. It's not terribly exciting but I think it's quite cute, sorry I photographed it on the most crumpled linen in the world ever!
When I was on the cruise with my sisters, every day I would order a large bottle of sparkling water and we would put the Vanilla Stevia in it. Now, I can have a choice of Vanilla, Lemon or Orange flavored sparkling drinks.
Welcome to the Power of Slow, the blog that accompanies a new book being released by St. Martin’s Press in the fall of 2009. The book is entitled The Power of Slow: 101 Ways to Save Time in Our 24/7 World.
Are you readers satisfied with the current state of NBA basketball?
If I have failed, why do I have this light and pleasant feeling of accomplishment? I have a sensation that I averted something significant, despite facing my greatest failure in my young life. I couldn’t stop it despite having a limitless resource of power.
I really enjoy cooking and love seeing people enjoy the food I have cooked, I love throwing dinner parties because it means I have a reason to spend my whole day in the kitchen cooking food!
A $50 gift basket of ribbon and other goodies from Ribbon and Bows Oh My
As the sun begins to set here on the west coast - we're busily getting ready for Christmas Eve . . . so I leave you with one of my favourite Christmas tunes (in fact, it's one that my own chamber choir performed a few weeks back at our SF holiday concert) - in the glorious setting of King's College in England.
Shattered Souls by Mary Lindsey
I am happy that I can take the boot off to sleep and shower, so that makes life a lot easier, even though I can’t walk still. I’m not sure why I thought I would be off the crutches after moving into the boot but I sort of thought I would. I guess this is going to take longer but that’s ok – I can wait it out. It will be worth it once it’s healed up and I’m finally able to do the things I haven’t been able to for a long time.
Interestingly, Andrews credited former Council president Valerie Ervin with preventing a “rush to judgment” on the expedited curfew bill, despite her own support (as it turns out) for that bill; he also said that time has shown that the July gang fight was an isolated event.
John Bambic, murdered while rummaging in a trash bin.
Being invisible
How shall I list them and wish for my children to ever fulfill them for me?
Once a favorite of elementary school children with tee shirts and sharpies, the idea of personalized gear has crossed over into the realm of weddings and other celebrations. Instead of a tee shirt, consider having guests sign a photo mat (then frame the mat with a photograph from the party), write their contact information in an address book, or compose messages inside a gift book or greeting card.
The background was made with Starburst Stain and Moonglow sprays and gesso layers, then stencilled over with DI.
I've tried a time or two, but I just can't.
PS: I'm not sure comments are working for everyone. Will you please e-mail me if you're having problems, americaninbath@gmail.com?
The herringbone set-up has been improved, with no less space for the passenger. More seats are able to be put in the cabin by using a slightly steeper herringbone, also allowing for a better view out of the window. This is something the previous product failed to deliver. The seat reclines a further 50%, again, an issue that the previous seat created a few complaints over. It’s still a flip-over seat with the real bed cushion on the reverse of the seat. Not to be outdone by their first seat, this one now extends into a whopping 7 foot 2 inch bed. Even the biggest of us should be comfortable. Whilst the images make the seat look narrow, Virgin boasts an increase of 1.5″ width in the suite.
“Planning is an unnatural process; it is much more fun to do something. And the nicest thing about not planning is that failure comes as a complete surprise rather than being preceded by a period of worry and depression.”
And puts a record on the gramophone.
For adults, this usually means making changes at work or in hobbies. For children, it means finding and removing sources of lead in the home. In most states, the public health department can help assess the home and identify lead sources.
Preheat oven to 400 degrees F.
What got you into penpalling?
2100 0325 41 02001422 05
As one of the few Father's, he stood out like a sore Socket Wrench. So we've since hit it off. Even though he is a New England Patriots fan. But for this I can be very forgiving. Besides...Pamela, another from the list of 'The Twenty' on the Recipients from Mission One, is a devout Pittsburgh Steelers fan, and I love her and her son Joseph, too.
I took a quick picture from my phone lastnight while we were in the hallway, it was about 10pm and Bryson has TAKS test today so he needed his rest. I made a cozy pallet in the hallway for the kids to sleep on and we had a mattress right beside them ready to cover us all if needed. Not sure if you can tell... Bentley is faking. ha!! She was wide a wake. She kept saying "ohhh the thuner is coming" (thunder).
That is the key here. This music is tried, never tired. "Reaching Out" is a classic album opener, all driving force and crunchy guitars. "We Can Have It All" is another classy tune, this time with a Crowded House feel in evidence.
The first mouthful, as might be expected, contained a burst of that alcohol flavor that was so strong in the odor. It was almost too much, honestly - made the beer just ever-so slightly over-bitter. Fortunately, the mouth-feel was very creamy, with just a bit of carbonated bite, and the after-taste contained hints of dried fruit (mostly raisin), toffee, and that unidentifiable "roastiness" again.
My favourite hiding spot when I was a child was at the top of the built in wardrobe in my room. I had books, cushions and snacks hidden up there too.
I made both braised red cabbage and dumplings to go with these. The dumplings were a disaster. I think I added too much liquid to the bread. They didn't hold their shape at all when I tried to simmer them in water (well, except for two of them), so I won't be posting that recipe. :P
Icy/Hot On The Toilet Seat – This will get you killed in your sleep. If you must, use Vaseline instead. Almost as funny, and defend with, "I could have used Icy/Hot." Your restraint will mark you as a hero.
5:05- I get to Julie's house and chat with her and get Brody ready to go.
Back now. Two days after Christmas. My house. I’m in the bathroom when I hear a knock on the door and hushed voices. I come out to see my husband standing stone faced with a police officer and a chaplain. My mother has done it. She’s taken her own life. It’s December 27, 1999.
"Sure!", I quipped back. "It says 'Do it Yourself'"
Anyway, here is where you can find ores.
Weird, I know. But kind of fun, right? So now I'm slicing and have switched Pandora over to something else for the fun of it. Yep, this post was composed to the tap of fingers on the keyboard and the sounds of Sweet Home Alabama.
I still don’t read much of The New Yorker. My wife gets it now on Kindle. Sometimes I'll read a movie review or something about the current music scene. I suppose I believe now that the EW is just as valid for entertainment news as The New Yorker ever was.
Then we have Carl and Sandy, a pair of serial killers who use their frequent 'holidays' as cover for their murderous road trips. Carl is a photographer and Sandy, when she isn't selling her body out the back of the bar she works in is using it as bait to lure in the next victim. Whilst driving around they pick up hitch-hikers and slowly bring the conversation around to the idea of their passenger having sex with Sandy whilst Carl takes some photos. These pictures go on to document the men's deaths, something which the two of them have subtly different reactions to. It is never entirely clear why Sandy would go along with this way of life, apart from having little alternative and a seriously screwed up sense of her own self-worth. She gets satisfaction from the killing with some of them and from the sex with others. Carl meanwhile not only considers what he does art but also feels that the whole experience brings him closer to God.
Talking of electricity, in this latest story, my wise-cracking gumshoe comes up the business tycoon who runs String City’s power plants. You don’t want to know what he uses for fuel. There’s also a beautiful woman who happens to be half-bird. When she sings, for the sake of your everlasting soul you’d better hope you’ve got your earplugs in. It’s a tricky case, mostly because it hinges on that most mysterious of things.
"However we pride ourselves on our strong relationships within our local communities and the way we deal with the issues that emerge."
Now, weir fucking donna is an obvious one, as is is phil lesh a jerk, but less predictable was the fact that three lost, lonely men (and you know that they are most certainly men) searched for ned lagin or ned lagin band.
SLOWLY add in powdered sugar and blend on MED speed for 2-3 minutes
B: Thank you for taking the time to complete this interview Burkey, and I wish you all the best with the release of your first series!
show.
I am vindictive words that cut to the bone
Notes: The balsamic vinegar gives the best flavor but I have used dry vermouth before with excellent results. You can mix all the ingredients by hand instead of using the food processor. The reason I use the processor is to break up the onions into the sour cream and mayo base because I think the onion flavor is a bit better. You can use whatever kind of sour cream or mayo you like, lite or full fat. Also, if you use leeks, be careful to wash them well and don't include the dark green part because they can make your dip bitter.
Clothes and dress rails.
We also meet an elderly man who has recently lost his wife. Always secretive about her past in mainland Europe it is only after her death that he begins to discover the full extent of what she had kept to herself and we will learn even more about the history of that desk and how it came to be in Varsky's possession in the first place. Not all of the sections are given an equal weight. There is no doubt that Aaron's narration is the strongest from a character point of view but it is Nadia and her meditations on writing itself that really held sway for me. This is where Krauss really deserves her comparison to Roth for providing a story that not only satisfies on its own terms but also has something to say about the act of writing itself. In her sections, begun and punctuated by the appeal Your Honor so that she is almost like a witness on trial, Nadia is unapologetic about the process of writing. Knowing that she has not been free in her own life she is strident that 'the writer should not be cramped by the possible consequences of her work. She has no duty to earthly accuracy or versimillitude. She is not an accountant; nor is she required to be something as ridiculous and misguided as a moral compass. In her work the writer is free of laws.' Later in the novel she has to admit how that isolation may have turned her into the kind of person so singularly obsessed that they neglect even the closest relationships in the the real world.
The following day my little girl and I added a good quantity of green colour to the royal icing, and as you can see we covered the sides of the house, as well as the roof. we used green sweets, with a few orange for relief to decorate the roof. The dancing leprechaun came from a Meri Meri St Patrick's Day cupcake kit, which although designed in Britain, I had had to order from Williams Sonoma in the United States. I do like his jaunty aspect, and will put his friends away safely for future St Patrick's Days!
PO Box 757
say otherwise.
My other niece bragged that she can do 100 leg lifts- I explained that it was easier for her because her legs are so small that they don't weigh anything so they are easier to lift. I told her if she really wanted to get some exercise, she could lift my leg 100 times!
The schools were formed in the time of the Umayyad Caliphate, where the Muslims experienced some socio-political problems, caused by a number of factors, among them the growing number of non-Arab Muslims, expanded rule, and internal struggle for power among various groups. This made it harder to establish a general consensus on questions of law, making it necessary for the local judges to make decisions based on other principles. The questions being presented for them, was typically solved while studying and discussing with their disciples or students, who would visit other study circles as well. With time some circles would attract more attention, and thereby becoming more notable. Also the area of their situation would play a factor, seeing that Mecca had one approach, traditionally being said to be focused on tradition, since the availability of people who actually had seen and talked with Muhammad, as well as their descendants, was high, while Iraq would be more based on reasoning, being somewhat distant to Mecca. It wasn’t always like that though, but true is it that the two places witnessed the creation of two distinct schools, Maliki in Mecca and Hanafi in Iraq.
As I impart my life-learned wisdom and offer criticism to her when asked (and often when not) I pause to consider that perhaps, just perhaps, she has something to teach me...
Friday is day 3 of week 6 and it is a 25 minute run. I am excited to see how it goes.
#1. Usain Bolt – Let me fix my hair before I go out here and dance when I’m done!
To say I enjoy tea would be an understatement.
PHOENIX (AP) – Arizona’s largely new clemency board on Monday is expected to consider the case of a death-row inmate set for execution next week.
My lucky number dress. This dress was actually started either third or forth, but got put on hold for the other dresses, since I was having difficulty with it. This look was inspired by Tori Amos's Bouncing of Clouds--the shoe's model name is in fact "cloud"-- and Father's Son, which I choose to think of as a girl being her father's son since she has no brothers, and thus conjures up images a sporty but sweet girl. I love how she always manages to inspire me, since I like mess up the lyrics to some of her songs to work for me. Mishearings that I refuse to correct, in this case, "So it ends so it begins/I'm my father's son./Plant another seed of hate/in a trusting virgin gun [girl]." I switched "gun" from the original lyrics with "girl" and refuse to switch back since it would ruin all my lovly images of the song, and I'd have to create new ones. Probably why I tend to sing the most depressing songs with the hugest smile on my face... (Come on people, you didn't think I was through obsessing over Tori so soon?) And oo! Linkin Park has a new album coming out on the fifteenth. The snips on their website sound different from their previous albums, but it still sounds like it's Linkin Park. This is officially the best ambiguously defined period of consecutive time ever! I fear the backlash of the worst ambiguously defined period of consecutive time ever, but shall ignore said fear until said backlash occurs.
“Historically, the mass-produced lagers have been marketed as a beverage targeting males in their mid- to high 20s, and it seems to me in advertising that I see for craft beer that it’s really not marketed as a gender-specific beverage.”
-rw-r–r– 1 root other 4224 Oct 29 2004 system-308
A hand on her behind?!
According to research by John Boynton Kaiser in the Journal of the American Institute of Criminal Law and Criminology, ‘Victor Hugo has given us a pretty faithful picture of many characteristic details of social England of the 17th century; but the word Comprachicos is used to describe a people whose characteristics are an unhistorical conglomeration of much that was once actual but then obsolete in the history of human society.’ Much that seems unimaginable today may have authentic roots in common practices of the seventeenth century.
Ok, all kidding aside, this is serious. In yesterday’s post I pointed out, my husband was having a bad day. As I’ve mentioned before, he’s a neurosurgeon. So often, he gets the terrible task of evaluating a young patient with a head injury who is not going to live. He has to be the one to say “There’s no hope, the injuries are too severe. There’s nothing that can be done.” And then, to bring up… “had you ever discussed wishes regarding organ donation?”
So after hearing him saying that he had already spotted her, I looked up and it’s seemed like the crowd parted as if they were curtains on a stage.
The ISS crossing over my back garden, passing just over Saturn
Could you imagine the mayhem, if OBL was still alive, recruiting and training the really nasty ones, AND arming them with real bombs, all by himself?
Anyway, I decided to get a little more used to the way the character looks… by drawing him!
2 tablespoons fresh chopped thyme
Driving through London town today, I caught a tantalising glimpse of the celebrations for the Chinese New Year, the year of the tiger. Today was the culmination of the fifteen days of celebration to mark the new year, and the streets of Soho and Chinatown were filled with colour. It reminded me of the vintage stylised illustrations used in Chinese packaging from the early 20th Century.
Cook for 12 to 15 minutes or until the potatoes are completely cooked and tender. Drain the potatoes and immediately return to the warm stock pot.
negative paternalism is not a spontaneous, not a philosophical but a psychological issue
This latest batch covers a few more bike art installations in the Metro Vancouver –courtesy of John Steil who has an interest in outdoor bike art while cycling around.
Even though I lived in the country for twenty years, I didn’t realise what went into agricultural show preparations.
Like StayFocusd, LeechBlock allows you to specify which days and at what time you would like to limit your time-wasting sites. LeechBlock also lets you set a time limit for how long you can surf your blocked sites before they are blocked for the day.
Multi-instrumentalist Scott Mosher is becoming a regular here on YourMusicBlog. Not so long ago I wrote about the second Oceans Of Night album, which I liked very much. So with some help from Scott I completed his whole discography. His older solo albums are already signposts of what Oceans Of Night is. The combination of ambient keyboards and progressive metal is already showing it’s face there. But with help from singer Scott Oliva he has raised the bar.
5) At this same time, Jesus’s disciples had real experiences that they believed were literal appearances of the risen Jesus;
More enchanting sounds and harmonies, in this case guitar-based, are to be found in Real Estate's sophomore work "Days". The New Jersey band follows the example of its recently reenergized neighbors The Feelies, creating the sort of majestic guitar soundscapes which could become the perfect companion for a road trip. And in case your road trip needs something a bit more psychedelic, try following "Days" with Wooden Shjips’ latest effort, "West", for your maximum trippy enjoyment. As for The Black Keys' just-released seventh effort, all I can say right now is that with every new spin of their "El Camino" this week, the album keeps climbing up in our year-end list, reaching higher and higher. Tune in around Christmas to see where exactly it will end up.
I was alerted to this movie by the lovely staff of Avenue Books in Albert Park and I'm so pleased they did: I've now bought the book, read the story and am ready and waiting to be terrorised out of my very thin writer's skin. Daniel Radcliffe (Harry Potter) plays a lawyer called Arthur Kipps who ventures to an old house in a remote village to sort out the affairs of a recently deceased eccentric. (Of course, lawyers rarely have time to do such things, but Daniel likes a bit of action so off he goes). Upon his arrival, though, he discovers the townspeople are keeping a deadly secret. What happens next will scare the bejesus out of you. The comments on forums seem to suggest it's one of the scariest movies for years. One 12-year-old said: "I don't know what the rating was for this film but it has now traumatised me for life!"
19But in the night an angel of the Lord, opening the doors of the prison, took them out and said,
"Just as man is destined to die once, and after that
If you haven't yet commented on my giveaway post below, you still have time!
smell something and it'll take you right back. You can't even place
Marion – My GRC buddy, reporting is tough and we had our lessons. Will miss you!
I was given my guitar. I wasn't given just any guitar either. It's a Taylor. If you don't know what that is then you are obviously not a guitar player and I am not looking down my nose at you but I am thinking about what you are missing out on. This is a beautiful instrument. It also came to me used which I also enjoy because you don't have to worry about being the one to make the first scratch... kind of takes the anal-ness out of it. And what, you may ask, does this have to do with being an internet gypsy? Don't get your undies in a bundle, I am getting to that part. The name of the guitar was Princess I say was because when I got her I just didn't fit us. I mean I know it could have been cute the whole Princess Jasmine thing and all that but for whatever her and I were going to become Princess just didn't fit us. So I changed her name. Gypsy. It fits. It fits us. I am an internet gypsy. Maybe it is all the years spent traveling. Maybe it's just the fact that I feel a fresh wind blowing (every watched the movie Chocolate? You should. You'd get the wind reference then.) and I just have to change.
But Holland has actually made a significant contribution to this summer’s footwear. Because it is the original home of this year’s must-have shoe – the clog.
1 clove garlic (peeled, whole)
Once I will open the hours and fall freely forward
When our life isn’t working out the way we want it to, we often blame external things or other people. The relationship isn’t working because he is dysfunctional, your job isn’t recognizing your full potential, or you aren’t making enough money and can’t afford a vacation. And it’s because of this or because of that, this circumstance or that person. Although these may manifest as external problems, it is often emotions or thought patterns that hold us back.
450 air time: 34 hours, 46 minutes
“Did I say you could come in?”
The fighting in Gaza is not a proper concern for a British political party - especially at a time when the Bankers’ Bust threatens the livelihoods of millions and what little remains of the social cohesion of our own country. One of the core tenets of our nationalist philosophy is that Britain should keep completely out of other people’s quarrels and wars unless there are clear issues of our own national interest to give us the right, and our government the duty, to interfere.
that eternal flame
“But when Jesus heard that, he said unto them, they that be whole need not a physician, but they that are sick. But go ye and learn what that meaneth, I will have mercy and not sacrifice; for I am not come to call the righteous, but sinners to repentance.”
this is the crock pot my precious mother got me from target. you should definitely invest in one.
Mary Jane finally gets that interview she wanted with Spider-Man (Drake Bell), and everything seems like it’s going to go off without a hitch. Too bad something’s riled up Bruce Banner, because he’s hulked out and ravaging the city. This might just be what MJ needs, however, because it certainly is the scoop of the week, and it’s all hers! But will Spidey be able to stop the Hulk from tearing up Manhattan? Find out this Sunday, May 6 on an all new ‘Ultimate Spider-Man’ on Disney XD!
Cast
10) Poultry Processor
now all i've had i still love you
Yes, anything is possible in my dreams. I can sew perfectly, I have no wrinkles and my boobs are perky. ( I know this because I shopped for coral and turquoise lacey little bras in my dreams one night..all the over the shoulder boulder holders I have are far from the lacey variety.)
This and other pivotal experiences have contributed to this intriguing man’s metamorphosis from international businessman to mellow blacksmith and unofficial leader of the Parallel Community, a group of kindred spirits interested in living in harmony with the Earth.
Carve out a cone-shaped bit from the top of each cupcake. Squirt or spoon in some of your lemon curd. Top the curd-loaded cupcakes with the frosting and eat!
harbored this ambition for some time, and are passionately dedicated to
Some folks love the adventure modules that are published, others just wing it. Again, if you’re just learning, buy a few ‘canned’ adventures to start out with.
Let me be your warning that when you combine fresh fruit and sugar together for the berry filling, cornstarch must be included in the mix. If you are less than perfect and forget this thickener, the succulent berries will bubble in the oven and create a runny, juicy mess. If you have chosen to use a cookie sheet rather than a sheet pan, the juice will run all over the oven. Burning sugar never smells good. It really doesn't smell good when it isn't your house or your oven. Nobody wants to have a flop like that in someone else's kitchen. It was a perfect mess.
Booktalk: Kate is bound for Stanford and an M.D. — if her family will let her go. Mary wants only to stay home and paint. When their loving but repressive father dies, they must figure out how to support themselves and their mother, who is in a permanent vegetative state, and how to get along in all their uneasy sisterhood.
The toughest part about each season is having to make up the WatchRanking chart each week, because so many shows are so many ways of good, and it’s hard to assign a numerical value to them. Despite all that, the other half of premieres rolled past, and here is your abridged view on some real gems this season. I did not have access to my system, so I had to pilfer some screenshots from elsewhere on the internet, so hat tip to Random Curiosity for that, who also reviewed those series too, if you’re interested in multiple angles.
The journey herein recalled continues to be made anew each time the miracle comes to mind, for that is peculiarly the right and responsibility of the imagination. It is a whole journey, intricate with motion and meaning; and it is made wit the whole memory, that experience of the mind which is legendary as well as historical, personal as well as cultural. And the journey is an evocation of three things in particular: a landscape that is incomparable, a time that is gone forever, and the human spirit, which endures. (4)
I've never really felt the 'need' or the desire to have my mother near me. I've always been that kind of a person, I like my space, I like to be 'on my own'. But lately, lately....I've never felt so alone.
Kyle: "Mom, aren't these sugar?"
My transfer was complete, and I was devastated. Every night, for a very long time, I would take the framed class picture on my bedside table, and I would touch the face of Matthew, and I would cry. I would never see him again, and it felt so bad.
The law, in Ohio, requires the holder of a CHL to promptly notify an officer that he/she has a CHL. The driver of the car in the video tries to do EXACTLY THAT, but the meathead is too full of himself and strutting around acting like the badass to bother LISTENING to the very citizens who rights he's shredding and then crapping all over.
"ANC leaders believe the ANC Youth League and its political allies will use this week’s marches on the Chamber of Mines, the Joburg Stock Exchange and the Union Buildings to begin calls for regime change in the governing party."
Row 9-11, ch1, turn, sc in each sc. Finish off.
#He is synonymous to love (only coz his name meant it), a flirt, and absolute entertainment. A bully to the core but that is his specialty. We share a mutual attitude towards each other (good & bad). He is the reason i’ll always remember April 1st.
In The Unarmed Invasion (1965) Lord Elton wrote, “We seem to be re-enacting the story of the Roman Empire, which in its decadence imported subject races to do the menial tasks.” In his autobiography, rock guitarist Eric Clapton tells of adverts that he saw in Jamaica for immigrants to come here and it was clear that they were being brought here as cheap labour.
Then, the descent into Ecclesbourne Glen, a crevasse-like gouge cleaved into the cliff top, the walls of which are near vertical in places, too steep for any vegetation to cling on, thus revealing the strata of crumbling sandstone. Where scrub has managed to gain a foothold, the hawthorn has been wind-sculpted by sea breezes funnelling along the narrow Glen and reclines gracefully, arching backwards aerodynamically. Over a footbridge, to climb breathlessly up the steps carved into the opposite wall, back onto the open clifftop at East Hill for the first view of Hastings. Far below, red roofs atop bay-windowed pastel blue and yellow Victorian houses and, beyond, the pier, silhouetted by the setting sun, jutting out into the sparkling sea.
“Cognizant of the vital importance of providing technology that enables the Iranian and Syrian people to freely communicate with each other and the outside world, as well as the preservation, to the extent possible, of global telecommunications supply chains for essential products and services to enable the free flow of information, the measures in this order are designed primarily to address the need to prevent entities located in whole or in part in Iran and Syria from facilitating or committing serious human rights abuses.”
Preparing for Uhuru
My great-aunt Dora Lillie Mahler died on June 9, 1950, and her life and death remain a mystery. She was living in a nice area of the Bronx with her mother, Tillie, at this time...and possibly with her widowed sister Henrietta Mahler Burk, whose husband Isaac Burk had died unexpectedly in 1943. (Henrietta and Isaac were my paternal grandparents.)
1. Okay, one of my earliest ambitions was to be an actor. There. I said it. I don’t know if this has influenced my lifelong love for movies or vice versa, but there’s probably some connection on some level. I did some amateur stuff when I was very young, and was told I had promise, but my teens came along and somehow it all got pushed off to the side. Maybe that was all for the best – I work in education now, and that pretty much involves putting on a one man show throughout the working day anyway!
Asked whether she was OK with home-schoolers teaching children that homosexuality is a sin, she said: “Parents are allowed to educate their children in whatever model of school they would like to and if they have particular views with respect to a number of issues and choose to educate their children at home as a result of that, they are entitled to do that,” she said.
I had planned to go clothes shopping with Craig this weekend but I actually got a chance to go with Mom on Thursday so ended up not going out on the weekend which meant more downtime for me - score!
Scratch, Maxie & Niney - Babylon's Burning
from you and I.
Have you got a young family? Then you need an MPV. At least, that's what the renault laguna 1.8 rt is one of the renault laguna 1.8 rt and Megane carrying the renault laguna spares, the renault laguna 2001 will retain that composure. That's not to say that these vehicles do and Renault's offering has been brought to bear in the renault laguna 2.0rt from the renault laguna reviews to cast aside that of a Volkswagen. It also expects the renault laguna 2.0 this squishy arms race to another level with a 200bhp supermini or customers eyeing conventional Clios who want some extra pizzazz. In common automotive parlance, the renault laguna 1.8 rt a far more in common with the greenest option regularly getting the renault laguna 1.8 rt, minimising costs isn't the renault laguna 1.8 rt is whether the renault laguna 1.8 rt like the renault laguna 1.8 rt a lot.
Normally I am not one to stick up for those I find do not really have it that hard in life. I mean there are some people that just have it a little easier in some areas of life than the rest of everybody. It's just a proven fact. It is really nothing to be ashamed of if you fall in to that category. It can actually be a huge benefit to you and to others around you if you choose to use it in a compassionate and eyes-wide-open manner. If you recognize that you are privileged in an area (or several in your life) you are more able to embrace that and put it to work for you and others around you.
I’m eating apples that look like they came from a root cellar.
Major Release Advances Image Quality, Performance and Workflow Flexibility for Photographers
A curious penguin and a caring hand.
Be sure that your school’s anti-bullying rules and policies address cyberbullying.
"A FALL IN WHISKY.
* Pour into rinsed mould and let cool. Once it comes to room temperature, refrigerate.
_______________________________________
A winner would be if I'd some how managed to save money compared with buying the same brands elsewhere. I think my best 'win' has been about 72p, which on a shop of say £100 would be about 0.7%.
In late 1985 he mysteriously lost his life at an underground ANC residence in Lesotho, where none of those he was with, including Nomkhosi Mini, was spared to relate the story.
Awwww. Okay, no punishment. Send both back up to their rooms.
Similarly, the creature Bailey describes in “Alternate Reality” in a story of only three paragraphs is a composite animal. It seems to have the head of a human attached to a nonhuman body. The creature has six green eyes with “incredibly long matching eyelashes” along with “ten foot concertina-style legs.” The creature is a male but could have been any of four possible sexes and, most importantly, the creature can speak with what appears to be a human voice, for with cryptic humor, it says, “I’m sorry Sophie, it’s not you, it’s me.”
2 T extra virgin olive oil
So again to review. Too much toxin, too much stress(which means not enough oxygen) impairs immune function. When the immune system is not working optimally the ability to kill off cancer cells is lessened. Too much sugar increases levels of insulin which encourages cell growth. So move, make a lifestyle change. Get active! Manage your stress. Find positive outlets for your emotions. Watch what you eat, focus on whole foods. Make sure you have healthy digestion and elimination. I hope this is clear and helpful. This is my opinion. This is what I have incorporated into my own life. This is what I see that helps others. Take what fits. Try it on for size. I hope you find information that is useful. If you have other information you would like to share please add it!
As far as the specialty grains go, I went very light handed. I think the carapils amount could be doubled with good results for more body and depth. A little bit of munich or vienna wouldn't be bad either. This beer turned out to be more of a German pilsner than a Czech due to the body, malt character, and the bitterness. I think that in order to push it more toward the Czech style without doing any decoctions more specialty grains and less bittering hops would be moving in the right direction. Using floor malted Bohemian Pilsner malt as a base would be good idea too.
613 D-III/29/1971. “A Lecture Against Lectures: Some Suggestions for Faculty Seminars.” American Association of University Professors Chapter, Rosary College, River Forest, Illinois.
We dr?ve t? P?cific Landing ?n Long Beach, California, aft?r stopping to bu? ?ome special lu?es dad n?eded fo? us kids. Walking in?ide the landing off?ce was exciting in itself, the sights and smells wer? of fish?ng ?nd fun. The walls ?ere covered with taxider?y trophies, ?ne a very hugh ‘Black Se? Bass’, had ? Cuban cigar in it’s mouth and exc?ted us even more. The boats outside were 85′ to 110′ ?n l?ngth, painted blue and white ?nd looked li?e some sort of floating heaven. We rented th? appropriate fi?hing rods and re?ls fo? ?e and m? brother. Dad helped ?s pick ?ut the right fishing tackle and leaders needed for big game fish. Finally, we got new gunny sacks to k?ep ou? catch in, and boa?ded th? boat.
here’s what i wore to the office on monday:
Happy Tuesday everyone and welcome to another fun challenge here at Digital Tuesday!
But al-Qaeda isn’t the only terrorist group that has benefited from Dar al-Hijrah’s institutional support for terrorism. Two U.S-based Hamas operatives, Abdelhaleem Ashqar and Ismail Elbarasse, are long-standing figures at the mosque. Ashqar served on Dar al-Hijrah’s executive board and Elbarasse was a founding member.
And these creations are formed through inspiration, which comes from an inner humanity observing the natural state of the world (including Culture). For instance, a writer takes a walk around the city. He/she is pottering about and suddenly notices something ordinary or extraordinary or mundane, causing a form of inspiration to burst forth from the mind. An artist then has no choice but to address this thought, no matter how bad the creation is.
Whether you’re just looking for the latest power shower, a brand new hob or planning a grand design of your own, Grand Designs Live gets you thinking about how your house could look if you had massive budget and Kevin McCloud to keep you on the straight and narrow.
Having some of the best baguettes I've ever eaten available 500m down the road will be pretty hard to beat.
Coconut(shredded)- 2 tbsp
Though Dreams From My Father is an autobiography, and hence non-fiction, Obama makes no mention of this “compression,” nor is their any note by the publisher, Broadway Books. In fact, Obama only acknowledged the “compression” after Maraniss learned that Cook had no recollection of some of the events at which Obama said she was present.
I am the LORD which exercise lovingkindness, judgment, and righteousness, in the earth: for in these things I delight, saith the LORD. Jer. 9:24
and lastly loyal friends who are always there for me and would lighten my load if only I would learn let them :-)
I should mention here that I bought a single year long membership to Sea World for myself which gave me a HUGE discount on everyones discovery cove tickets this trip, and from the day we spent here back in March at ETAAM. It saved me well over HALF what it normally costs, or else this day definitely wouldn't have been in the budget. Dominick and I opted not to pay the extra fee for the dolphin swim, but Alyssa really wanted to do it.
4) In the event you don’t own a shovel. DO NOT go to a neighbour asking to borrow theirs. Doing so will lead to questions like. Do you need some help? Or the ever popular. What are you digging for? So it’s best to avoid your neighbours during a time like this or you’ll end up having to dig two holes. If you have to, go to Wal-mart and purchase one. Just a side note for all you browsers out there who are easily taken in by a clearance rack of cheaply made in China accessories. Don’t make eye contact! Don’t ask for assistance! Don’t talk to anyone! Just go in get a shovel and be on your way and for God sake pay in cash.
Mate = friend not someone you want to mate with or make your mate.
Located in the historic town of Silverton, 45 miles south - just over an hour's drive - from the Portland metropolitan area, the Oregon Garden Brewfest will also feature games and activities, live music, food, beer trivia and tasting lessons by Women Enjoying Beer, a Brewer's Tasting Dinner, a Connoisseur Tasting and a homebrew competition presentedby Capitol Brewers.
The main female character is Noor, a beautiful and successful fashion designer. But the real key to the overwhelming popularity of the show is that MAN, Noor’s husband. The part of the tall and handsome Muhannad is played by a 24 year old über-attractive Turkish actor/model named Kivanc Tatlitug, with dreamy blue eyes, flawless skin, a manly rugged beard, and perfect blonde hair. “Why couldn’t I have been blessed with hair like his?“ my curly brown haired son Adam constantly laments.
Name: Glow-In-The-Dark Skeleton
- Nikki, Maidenhead, 02/3/2012 15:11
The final touch was toasting the marshmallow frosting with my creme brulee torch. I wanted the frosting to be like freshly toasted marshmallows while we were camping, so I even brought my torch along to the campsite! Hope everyone enjoyed them!
I used the following approach to download and feed the data in db
And the little guy will have to get his own very special celebration in September!
“Because anything large, you nationalize”!!
Sheikh Al Luhaidan, the oldest member of the highest Islamic council was probably the most shocked by King Abdullah’s speech. In an interview on an Islamic cable TV network, Al Majd, he said that he had no prior knowledge of the king’s decision nor was he asked his opinion on the inclusion of women. He also said he wished the King had not mentioned the highest Islamic council at all.
There was a written notice above Him, which read: THIS IS THE KING OF THE JEWS.
The myth that the UK can be in Europe but not run by Europe has died after the Friday (December 9, 2011) vote over the fiscal deal, Nigel Farage claimed.
Friend: “I can never make myself read those books”
I also sat down today to figure out how to set up some pace-specified workouts in my Garmin. Turns out it's not that hard to set up. You can easily set your intervals and the target pace and all kinds of things at the Garmin Connect website...
Earlier in the week, I was told that by reading this book and it meaning so much to me in some way has made me forsake "the TRUTH" and to be perfectly honest...for a minute (and I gave it NO more time than that) I felt some righteous anger. How dare someone try and steal the joy that I found in this book. I truly felt attacked. Then...a marvelous thing happened. I went for a drive and I needed some uplifting music....so I blasted beautiful Mandissa. Never gonna steal my joy! What a powerful song! Just read the lyrics!
with-out that shabby chic look.
2. The centrifugal clutch springs are weak or broken.
Making life go on.
The best part if having my run done before the boys got up? While Little Red was at preschool, I went shopping. For 3 blissful hours!!! Maybe early morning runs aren't such a bad thing after all.
then it was on to birmingham, alabama. i went to see the civil rights institute and the 16th street baptist church (where the four little girls were killed in a bombing.) i am kind of glad the church was not open that day for tours, b/c i think it would have been a little much. it is horrific enough learning about the many murders without actually visiting the sites. but i am glad i got to see the outside.
Our waitress came out to clean off the tables and I gestured her over to us. I asked her, "Did you ask your manager?"
As I laid in bed, still a bit peeved, thoughts of things I were trying to accomplish ran through my head. And as they flashed I started recognizing where self had played a part. There were a lot of “I don’t” or “I want” or “I feel” or “I don’t feel.” A lot of I, I, I’s were being revealed to me.
The cardinals arrive at della Rovere’s, trying to be incognito in black cloaks, but their red robes are clearly visible underneath, so they kind of failed there. As della Rovere calls the meeting to order, Alexander takes Giulia to Orsini’s former palace, where she’ll be staying. It may be worth noting that the real Giulia was married to a member of the Orsini family, although they don’t mention it here.
Just when everyone was getting ready to go to the park, we were hit with a really gloomy weather that we did not know whether to proceed with the barbeque, or to have a change of plans. After a slight drizzle for a short while, the sky was still grey. We were at the park, but hesitated whether to start the fire. We waited and waited.... for another half an hour or so, eventually the rain stopped completely and the weather was cool. :) Heaven was on our side!
holy and just Father,
Happily representations to achieve this are already in hand but, less happily, no one knows if and when the legislation can be implemented.
The major feature that can be seen in Figure 1 is the abrupt change in editing that occurs at shot 437 when Michael Myers attacks Laurie. From this point on the editing is consistently quicker as Laurie escapes from the house and then is attacked by Michael in the closet. Within this extended violent sequence there are some longer shots, and as before these are associated with Loomis searching for Michael, though when he shoots Michael this is edited quickly. The film ends with a sequence much slower as Michael appears to be defeated and then has disappeared (shot 590-606). It will be interesting to see whether Halloween II (1981) being with a similar style as the narrative picks up from the point at which the original film ends.
This movie doesn’t have a lot to offer you unless you have kids, but I think you’ll actually find it mostly cute if you end up watching it with them. The story is silly, nonsensical, and somewhat dumb, but it’s also really cute and has a couple of funny moments in it. If you like Russell Brand, that would be a plus for you with this movie. If you’re like me, he’ll be very hit and miss but bother you much less since you barely have to see his face. I’ll recommend this movie for kids, but say skip it for the single people. Hop gets “I am a bunny and am incredibly sexy” out of “This must be the rags part of my rags-to-riches story.”
Bottom line, I’m so sorry I may of let some of you down.
After all, is there any greater absurdity than a medical model that treats the symptoms of disease with sub-lethal dosages of toxic chemicals and in which there is no attempt to uncover, understand or remove the causes of those imbalances?
What: A discussion with special guest Jill Brenneman- child sex-trafficking survivor (and later, consenting adult sex worker), sexual assault crisis counselor, & advocate for harm reduction & sex work decriminalization with Sex Workers Without Borders
Well two days of the three day weekend have passed by - definitely an exercise in dodging raindrops! So far we've managed to do the things we've wanted to - just making sure the right clothing was worn - more December at times than early May though.
1 feasts
I actually got a lot done this weekend, all things considered. I finished my latest secret project – more on this later… I got phase one of the seasonal cleaning done… Took down and deep cleaned, oiled, and rearranged my altars to suit our current needs… got some oils strained and set aside for use…
Situated in a bright, wine-red building in the district of Cukurcuma, the Museum of Innocence houses real and fabricated artifacts from everyday Turkish life between 1950 and 2000, in an homage both to the novel and to Pamuk’s Istanbul.
Noted American conservative thinker Russell Kirk starts out from a premise very similar to White's but draws quite different conclusions. He finds LOTS of policy-preferences that a conservative outlook leads to. He says here:
The Viscount Who Loved Me was a perfect second book. The next one is to be with Benedict who Quinn has kept quiet which seems to be his character but only time will tell.
Bendis, Brian Michael, and “Breakout.” New Avengers #1.
ATSUSHI – いつかきっと・・・(I’ve always felt that he has such a gorgeous voice and he’s the main reason why I love EXILE ballads so much. But this song just does something to me…one of the few songs released this year that can actually make me cry.)
The girls pillowcase dresses are so adorable. By combining a delicate flower and solid contrast you get an outfit that supports the team while still having feminine style. The sports team patches adorn the front for that final touch. You can customize your dress by deciding the size of the ties, number of ties, or
**Please keep in mind that these sessions are only 25 minutes, so if you feel that your child/children will need more time to capture their true personality, I encourage you to schedule a full session.
I think that souvenirs are an important part of travel so that you do remember all the amazing things you’ve seen and experienced. I don’t necessarily mean buy 8 million things and blow all your money on souvenirs, but find things that mean something to you and remind you of something special about your trip! So, today I’m just going to share some pictures of some of my favorite souvenirs I’ve collected:
After a minute of quiet I noticed that she was crying:
Open Data Ottawa is planning a TransitCamp brainstorming session sometime in the next two months.
Buy Bank Nifty Fut above 10685 with placing targets of Rs. 10800-10888 with keeping a stoploss of Rs. 10600.
In one of my dreams on Wednesday night, I was feeling the baby move a ton, and watching my stomach move along with her. All of a sudden I see a tiny handprint pushing outward on my stomach, and it came out so far I was able to interlock my own fingers with hers. It was pretty cool.
A very pleasant surprise and 4/5 of the tasting crew liked it.
It has been a tiring day for all.
Côte de Toul, just west of Nancy is the only Appellation Crontrôlée in the region,having been promoted from VDQS in 2003 and produces a mere 600,000 bottles of wine a year from its 110 hectares. It makes all three colours, but most is made in a Vin Gris or rosé style from Gamay and Pinot Noir – I have yet to try one.
6.teenage bloodlust
Were those original labels factually incorrect, meaning the new one's are merely setting the record straight?
It is certainly no easy task to rescue the prune, for its degradation has been a long time in the making. Stewed prunes have suffered from a forced association with institutions of discipline. Their affiliation is with the thick-lipped – but somehow always chipped – china bowls of the school, the boarding house and the nursing home. These houses of shrivel stored prunes in dusty tins the size of Gladstone bags. When finally released, the prunes were the colour of cockroaches and smelled thinly of death and dustballs. They leaked their embalming fluids into the thin, livid yellow custard in which they were always served. And worst of all, we who were served these prunes knew, with precision, that they were sent to discipline us. From the inside, out.
How fortunate were we to have sunshine and deep blue skies on a day my husband and I set out on a planned country walk. My original idea, a.k.a. “the plan” was to follow a prescribed walk that featured a panoramic view of the Cotswold plain and a rock formation called Devil’s Chimney. How hard is it to follow a set path with a map and clearly described markers? Apparently, harder than we thought. But, as is often the case for us, getting lost was all part of the fun.
This time it was the state's highest criminal court ruling that parole officials violated the due process rights of parolees labeled as sex offenders without being allowed to attend their parole hearings, present a defense or confront prosecution witnesses.
L-R: Jane Iredale Bronze A Go-Go Bronzing Powder - I got this in a gift bag during fashion week, I use it to contour my cheekbones and give my cheeks a bit of a bronze-y glow. Perfect for spring and summer!
Moving onto 2nd grade.
I’m going to start this blog by firstly admitting I don’t really know what I’m talking about. I’m going to justify it by stating nobody really knows what they are talking about and my opinion is as good as any. It is on the topic of heavy drinking, inspired by Glyns posts here, and Mudges reaction to it here.
She opens her post by asking:
Your mercy catches me when I fall,
On Friday 2 March Mrs Cross’s Year 10 English class joined her and the Librarian Mr Bull for an excursion to the first Adelaide Writer’s Festival Schools Day. Students were treated to three very different sessions. The third entitled, “Constructing a Character” featured Adelaide author and illustrator D.M. Cornish. Students and teachers alike were treated to an excellent question and answer session between author/illustrator David Cornish and his Adelaide publisher Dyan Blacklock from Omnibus Books. She told the story of how Cornish went from jobbing illustrator with Omnibus to their most high profile writer in a very short space of time. The film rights to his Monster Blood Tattoo trilogy have been bought by the Jim Henson Company and so his star seems to rise ever higher. During the session David spoke of how he came to creat his ficitional world, The Half Continent over more than eleven years through dozens of unpublished notebooks.
(I will gladly amend my list if you can find me a body of communication from any of the above which shows they are not actually bigoted and can explain the bigoted positions they have already expressed/acted upon).
